everything checks out here, move along.
A baby seal walks into a club
A white sheet over your head with eyeholes.  A classic ghost.  If you want a deeper cut into the memory rut, cut more holes than necessary and go as Charlie Brown:  http://imgur.com/TmLRA
functions: http://www.powershellpro.com/powershell-tutorial-introduction/powershell-functions-filters/  arrays: http://ss64.com/ps/syntax-arrays.html  foreach: http://www.powershellpro.com/powershell-tutorial-introduction/logic-using-loops/  since this is an assignment, put in a little more effort and i'm willing to help you a bit further.
Damn dude, put a ring on that now!
Damn, I wish I had time to smoke these monsters
Become established, take a leave or resign, and be able to come back when the kids aren't as helpless. I dunno. 
Celebrating war? Yeah, you're definitely in America...
You haven't gave me any example. It's just a big list of bullet points with nothing to back it up. It's not because it's big and sounds like it could happen that it's true. When do you feel fans are pushing it in your face? Why do you consider it hostility? Can't you understand that "advertising" MLP is some sort of way of sharing the love and good stuff?
So did you smoke with them? What happened next?
No, he just has a plain sword as he never bothered to learn his zanpakutou's name.
You think I'm joking... Lol
What plans do you have for yourself? Are you in school? What do you do? It all depends on your situation. If you don't want to live with your mom but still want to make investments I would research other investment options. 
Toes maybe?
Don't turn your back. Don't look away.  (I'm pretty sure it's my second today...)
[Just Saying.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ferret_legging)
When are people going to learn about the deep, genuine *love* for fine stovetop cookware?
Aha. Thank you, sir.
This is outrageous! What law states she needs to keep her plane tickets for all of her life?  I am hoping I don't have to jump through that hoop, as for getting my Permanent Resident card, I have to provide a list of the times I was out of the country already. Every. 5. Years. Even there, I do not have to provide plane tickets, but just a list of when I left, and for how long!
LUCID [**loo**-sid]: *(adjective)* easily understood; shining; transparent
Redpower mod or just really fucking big?
Nobody wants a bruins jersey either besides maybe seguin because he is nasty
It doesn't sound like you're sexually compatible. If I was not sexually compatible with someone, I would not stay with them, because sex is a big part of a romantic relationship to me. It doesn't sound like you just need to compromise. You mentioned other points not just about the frequency of sex but about her not participating actively in the sex and refusing to do some things that you enjoy. That's her right, obviously, but you have to decide if those things are things you WANT in your sexual relationships or not. You can't resent her for saying no forever if those are simply things she's not interested in doing. 
It's true, only the ball uses electricity, according to the lore
don't be modest! Generators can run for weeks, and which they do. It's only now that the American media shows there has been a power outrage, but in India, its just normal business. Sure power got blown at a large area instead of small areas, but for Indians, it's just an extended outrage, and for IT companies- no big deal.
No, you own the registration, they have the title.
I'll check CL for some speakers, but is going through the trouble of finding speakers that are several decades old and in need of repair really necessary for a beginner's set up? I feel like I don't need to go quite that far just yet, to get some quality sound.  And I doubt that the PL60 will give me the same problems as my Jensen, because my Jensen was playing my 33s at a slightly slower RPM than 33. I didn't notice it at first but I eventually I realized that all my records sounded slower than they should be.   Thanks!
In our current society, who already owns land/capital? Who stands to gain from a shift into a libertarian "utopia" where owners of land/capital can do whatever they damn please? Who, in our current society, loses the most? How was the original phrasing at all confusing?
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: Nobody tell them the truth! &gt;Meme: Confession Bear &gt;* MOST OF MY FRIENDS AREN'T ON REDDIT  &gt;* SO THEY THINK I'M CLEVER AND HILARIOUS &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3qaz1t.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/v6cjv)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||MOST+OF+MY+FRIENDS+AREN%27T+ON+REDDIT+-+SO+THEY+THINK+I%27M+CLEVER+AND+HILARIOUS)] This service is found useful by people who can't reach Quickmeme (due to outages or firewalls), the blind/disabled (using screen-reader software), and other robot sympathizers. See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) or my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/) for more info. 
There is one reason why I can't grow my own tomatoes, and thats because of my lack of self control. Every time I see a ripe tomato just ready to be picked, I NEED to eat it. The taste of a fresh tomato is the most heavenly thing one can ever have the glory of putting in their mouths.
You guys are honestly too good at this O.o
I wear boxers with anything but pants, then I wear Hanes Boxer Briefs. I wear Hanes undershirts too because they hold there size and form better then Fruit of the Loom undershirts.
Ha, Haha,hahaha
I don't work there any more. I don't know if you've ever been to a guitar center though. Their entire business model is based around you being able to touch whatever you want. 
Thank you
I read all the info you have currently, and noticed a few things missing. 1: to activate a nether portal, you must light the inside of the frame on fire. 2: to activate and end portal, you must place an eye of ender (which you obtain by killing an enderman and combining the ender pearl he drops with blaze powder, which you get in the nether by killing a blaze and grinding up the blaze rod he drops.) into every block of the frame that doesn't have one. 3. you activate an aether portal by dumping water into the inside of the frame.  Pictures: Nether Portal: http://www.minecraftopia.com/images/guides/nether_portal_example.gif  End Portal: http://images2.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20120113132917/minecraft/images/f/f2/The_End_Portal_ready.png (note: this is with the eyes of ender Aether Portal: http://images3.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20110731134158/minecraftaether/images/b/b7/2011-07-31_16.38.21.png Hope this helps!
I use Camomile Gentle Eye Make Up Remover from The Body shop.  I have *really* sensitive skin and this one is amazing.
Thx
I'm too poor to buy anything so it's not a lost sale to me, if I could afford it, I would buy everything...
*Worst* kid story? Ok. I grew up in a neighborhood with what seemed like 30 other children + or - 4 years of age from myself. Probably closer to 10-15 total. It was awesome. The older kids had all the cool toys and the younger ones had their adventures. There were no cliques or groups. Well all had a genuinely fun time.   Christmas time was the best because each household got to showcase their latest and greatest toys. I for one, was showing off my brand new Nerf Bow and Arrow. I live in the south, it doesnt really get cold in the winter so we are all playing outside. Everyone. We have big wheels racing around, power wheels scootin along the sidewalk. Footballs and soccer nets. Baseballs and a new basketball hoop. It just seemed so lively. But me. Me with my Nerf Bow and Arrow would hunt my sisters down. I'd fire an arrow, hit them pick it up and run away. One of them eventually got fed up and threw a rock she had gotten from our walkway in my direction. I took cover behind a tree, but I was relentless. I fired another arrow, and another. It seemed like I had an endless supply of arrows! But... they had more rocks. And my sisters, being among the older kids in the neighborhood encouraged the others to join them. So in a matter of minutes, I was firing arrows blindly into a barrage of rocks from behind a tree. They would whiz past my head every time I poked out for a shot. I was trapped. There were 7-9 kids throwing rocks at me.   Finally my sister calls a seize fire, casually walks up to the tree... and bunkers me. She hit me with a rock in the stomach and boy was I mad. I wanted to tackle her and spit on her face so I chased her. I chased her in a big circle. Across the street into my neighbors yard, caddy-corner, our neighbors yard and was coming back to my house.... where the kids awaited each with a rock. I got stoned. So much so that I had to get 7 stitches on my left eyebrow, not to mention the other cuts and bruises that resulted from getting pelted with rocks. As soon as I let out that wail, all the kids fled. I didnt know how bad it was until I looked in the mirror on the way to the hospital. Blood running all down my face. They had to give me a sedative just to put the stitches in. I still am terrified of rocks.   TLDR; Had a big neighborhood and all the kids stoned me.
I feel ya. I went through something similar -- she didn't have an ex but she also didn't want anyone to think we were together. No displays of affection... she wouldn't even introduce me to people if we ran into someone she knew while we were out.   I was crazy about her at the time. Sometimes I notice the old feelings creeping back, and it helps to realize with 20/20 hindsight how so much of our "dating" experience was fucked up and unpleasant.
That's just twice the population of the United States, to put that in perspective. 
It feels weird that a band that started out sucking ass still sucks ass
Too far. just. too far man.
death by exile
Board members can certainly be thrown in prison if you can prove their negligence caused the victim to die. They're subject to the same criminal laws as anyone else.
It's much easier to notice when the vid is in constant loop.
This belongs in /r/RealGirls not AmISexy. I think we all know that you know that you're sexy. :|
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: feelsbadman.jpg, for instance. &gt;Meme: Sudden Clarity Clarence &gt;* ADDING ".JPG" AT THE END OF SOMETHING  &gt;* IS REDDIT'S WAY OF DOING A HASHTAG &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3qaik2.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/ijofh)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||ADDING+%22.JPG%22+AT+THE+END+OF+SOMETHING+-+IS+REDDIT%27S+WAY+OF+DOING+A+HASHTAG)] This service is found useful by people who can't reach Quickmeme (due to outages or firewalls), the blind/disabled (using screen-reader software), and other robot sympathizers. See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) or my first [AMA](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/) for more info. 
Denny's chicken and waffle fries are better. But I can't lie, Chick-Fil-A has some damn good chicken and waffle fries.
This made me incredibly sad....
Try www.ficly.com
&gt;So, a woman born without ovaries then should not be considered a woman  Not exactly, she was born as female. Gender doesn't come solely from the reproductive organs present, that was just a point of affairs where i would reconsider this. It's not hard at all to deal with malformations etc.  &gt;Also, that calls for a third gender/sex category for official forms, at the very least.  No, you are the gender you are born with(Hermaphrodite being the exception for obvious reasons). To consider law-wise a change in gender is worthless until you can reproduce like someone on that gender. For that should be the only distinction the law makes(you know pregnancy and all..), that i can think of.  &gt;So, the dictionary trumps all other forms of understanding?  I have not said this, i suggested you did visit the dictionary, no more, no less. Although language-wise the dictionary is the authority for definitions, so... in order to properly speak it is advisable you keep to dictionary definitions.(assuming information is the point, that is, excluding poetry and others that gain from playing with words)  &gt;What about if I find a scientific definition that disagrees with the dictionary?  The dictionary isn't static, words change for stuff like this.  &gt;Should I still treat the dictionary as the exclusive arbiter of what the parameters of social categories are?  That's as irrelevant a question as it gets, i have not demanded this nor implied it is so. No, you shouldn't.  I don't know how you get to the dictionary is the sole arbiter part, this "For more on this i suggest" should have let it clear that it is only a good source of info. It all sounds just like rhetoric, instead of arguing the real point which is there's no reason the law should recognize them as females besides them wanting it. Same way i won't, because there's no reason to do so.  &gt;I'm reading this argument as 'the government shouldn't respect your identity'  So you are reading it however you like instead of how it is stated? &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;  Do not confuse your identity, with what you want your identity to be. Else i'll want to be God on my id. Because i 'feel' like one. It is ridiculous to acknowledge this sort of 'sex change', as an actual sex change, it's peoples bodies and their fancies, and i'm fine with that, but putting it in the law is completely pointless.  I could agree to having a 'transgender female' on their id, for easy identification(by police and so on), but that's all. No actual sex change is going on. And legally speaking they should still be treated as their gender.
Classic selection problem, dawg...how do you know what you want?  A little rhyme: if it doesn't suck, don't fuck (it up). If it blows, say, Hell noes.  I hope it works out for you. Try a break? Shit can give you a taste of single-life again, see if it's really what you want - or if, like many men in their mid-late twenties, you're just bucking against the saddle a bit, but ultimately want to stay together.
&gt;She was skinny with big boobs.  I couldn't help but laugh. 
Like legalising (at least medically) cannabis: sure, it's not the number one pressing concern of our times. Stoners want to have their fun legally? Who cares? Right? Let's focus on employment, education, lowering the crime stats and an end to all forms of institutional and political corruption. Right?   No.  I pick this example because I think most redditors are aware or what a waste of time and resources the whole prohibition of cannabis thing is; it permeates into everything and a change in it's status could change everything. At least a little bit. For the better. Not just on the level of common sense economics, and all that correlates to, but that it poisons the minds of the populace against this largely benign form of intoxication.   Now, oppositewise, keeping some animal in cruel conditions for it's eggs or fur or whatever is legal and so the populace continues on it's unemphatic, uncaring, thoughtless trajectory about such issues.   Being cruel can be fun for some and is, perhaps, necessary sometimes (debatable), but... Fur? Really?  Should it be a commonly accepted and legislatively condoned practice? C'mon! Fur? Right now, we really, really don't need it in this part of the world. Let the peoples in and around the arctic circle take what they need on that score. But for anyone else it's either mindless, vacuous vanity or a very sick and twisted sense of comportment.  It may not seem like THE most important issue but it fucking permeates. It's part of a tapestry of ideas that trickle into everything. Don't divorce yourselves from what you know is right because you're afraid of seeming too PC (sharp intake of breath)... I mean... carry on, nothing to see here. What? Nobody said PC... (whistles nonchalantly)...
[](/yes)  [](/sp)[](/deviouspie) I'll be there till 7AM. I vote for pink with purple polka dots.
Again, no idea.  It's all based on if the website/company ships to your specific location.  The website only tells you about the deals and the manufacturer sells the clothes as normal.
ooo there's also "Through the Wormhole; with Morgan Freeman" and "The Cosmos; with Carl Sagan" on youtube 
MAN FUCK THAT TURTLE. HIS ASS COMES AROUND AGAIN IMMA MAKE SOUP!
Never call them "a piece of shit." I know it was always said in the heat of the moment, but after countless heated moments it's really stuck in the back of my mind.
I think some things are not the best on there for sure, but I like the overall concepts.  Arcade is also one of the smartest ideas I have seen out of Blizz's SC2 team in awhile.  Could make SC2 one of those games you just have because it comes with tons of other games.  For example in War3 many people only keep it to this day for DOTA or any of the other UMS's.  They have room to improve, but I think this is a a small step in the right direction. 
I've never heard any evidence to back up what you're saying-- in fact, all I've ever heard about raw diets from vets, dog rescue workers, and trainers are positive things. I have also been told directly by numerous vets to stay away from foods that contain grain and corn. The sole reason I don't feed my own dog raw is that he requires a low-protein diet due to kidney problems and is small, so it simply wouldn't be practical to purchase/use the tiny amounts of meat he'd need before it went bad.  There's nothing wrong with feeding a healthy and high-quality commercial food, but Purina certainly doesn't fall under that banner.
*1.3 comes out In a day* whyyyyyy did my graphics card fail on Friday?! Lol wish I could be celebrating with with you man! I just wanna thank **you** for thanking everyone! They all deserve it! Upvoted
[This is what I think of your cat post.](http://i.imgur.com/P7UM9.png)
i thought V for vendetta was great. the story was well put together and the acting was amazing. eventhough the realism of the story seemed far fetched it was still a really good movie
aha, ya about 12-15 minute drive close (With my driving at leasts :P)
That was SO LONG!
From the pic, a graft would not be immediately necessary.  You can have a super cheaper, no anesthesia, light-cured varnish placed on the tooth near the gum line to address the sensitivity.  
Have you had any major "culture shocks" since coming here? 
The balls on that guy.
Memento is definitely the best, but it's the original twist ending that is overlooked: Vertigo.
I agree with you, and I've even heard stories of doctors Googling their disease... right in front of them.  Because of my E.R. visit, I basically decided to educate myself as much as possible. Now when I go into the E.R. I can tell the physician how to treat me, which is kind of weird.
haha, you'd be surprised how often that happens. :D
Not the first time I couldn't tell if someone was doing a parody of /r/atheism or being serious.
no api, slow website, hilariously clueless admins, a worthless coder who either spends no time on the site, or chooses not to, and the stuff that he adds is super trivial and usually fucks it up in some way.   actually removing features over time (hello commissions tab!), the constant advertising for FAU (instead of you know spending money to improve the fucking site) , the list goes on.
Born and raised in LA and never been there. Kudos! Ill most def make a stop there.
Rape fantasies are one of the most common (if not, *the* most common) fantasies that women have. Something like 82% (IIRC) of women have had it as a fantasy in at least one point in their life. It's incredibly different from actual rape here. It's like consensual rape where the woman actually wants it to happen and in a very specific way. Anything outside her personal boundaries and the fantasy loses all its appeal. It's basically the ultimate form of being dominated in a safe, controlled situation.
I think it's thought-provoking enough in that it lists some good reasons as to why miracles are just natural phenomenon rebranded as "goddidit."
Mine too
Blanche is Samantha's mentor I suppose
I would say "Too much time on my hands" by Queen.  Maybe they'll get the hint...
Add to that, they were much smaller in stature than today's soldiers. Maybe 5'5"-5'6", 140-150 lbs or thereabouts on average.
This is the problem..people do NOT need to be scared into not committing serious crimes in the first place. That's a HORRIBLE approach. People need to be taught why not to commit serious crimes, the personal and social consequences and all that. If history has taught us 1 thing it should be that just scaring people into doing what you want isn't, and has never been, a good approach to anything.
Who knows if it will happen but I am hoping Laquinton Ross has a breakout year. All the things you hear about him from camps and stuff says he is the real deal. 
One of the few Browning designs that's easy to work on. The man was a genius, but MAN are some of his designs complex.
I understand that you are trying to alert people, but the rule is you don't talk about hackers period. Please alert people you know, but don't post about hackers on this sub reddit. 
Ha! That's in Saskatoon!
Haha that was good.
Would you do Portal 2 for Skyrim?  Or Here's my list  http://www.reddit.com/r/gameswap/comments/xd4fa/usah_list_inside_360_ds_ngc_psp_ps2_gbc_w_offers/
i would say one of the culprits to you being kind of brushed aside, is that you have a 4 almost 5 yr old car, with 105k miles on it. 20k miles a year is pretty high. most coverage ends at 100k miles, i would check to see if yours has run out. i would be willing to bed they're thinking *YOU* are the reason the car is having so many problems. i work at a buick dealership myself, in the repairs / detailing area. i havent heard of an Enclave having this much trouble, so im not gonna lie, it was my first thought as well. You may have just had the skunk of the run for that day :(  the cost of the radio replacement sounds high, but i wanna mention a few things. 80% of the features you listed, is thru that unit itself. there is an antenna, a camera on the back, and the speakers. the rest is the unit itself. you could buy an aftermarket radio for cheaper, but unless you want to install it yourself (honestly, is fairly easy, esp if you use Crutchfield), it'll cost 100-300 to have it installed properly, depending on where you go. This link is a generic search for Navi units that fit in your car, thru Crutchfield. http://www.crutchfield.com/g_300/Car-Receivers.html?tp=5684&amp;nvpair=AG_Type%7cYCNavigation the cheapest one is $600. im not even sure that will even use your reverse camera, either.  so looking at all of that, it doesnt sound so bad. you would get the one that is designed specifically for your car. Personally, i would just go that route, or just upgrade the whole system (unit/speakers/sub). sounds like you are in the vehicle a lot, so a fresh more crisp system would definately get its money's worth in usage.  you can also go into the dealership, ignore the sales people, and go to the parts area directly. you can ask the person at the counter if they can order new units, or refurbished only. if it's a refurbished unit, i would pass. if it's a new unit, i say get it.  ALSO keep in mind, since you are probably out of your warranty now, the salesmen are wanting you to trade it in for the 2012 model. while they may not be pushing that notion directly at you, its is most definitely their state of mind.  EDIT: i just read this, and i noticed i sort of imply how you are being treated is justified, im sorry, it most definately isnt. it shouldnt matter if you are buying a brand new car, or just getting repairs, you shouldnt be getting this sort of runaround. perhaps you should look around for the next dealership that is within a reasonable travel distance. they may give you the same answers as the local place, but at least you wont be getting this cold shoulder attitude it sounds like they are giving you.  (sources: http://www.fhwa.dot.gov/ohim/onh00/bar8.htm - www.crutchfield.com)
Gary "Not Voting" Johnson 2012.
Everyone in this whole thread is laughing at you. You tried to brag about how fast you got geared, or make fun of how easy it is to get geared in this game, when you didn't even get geared quickly. A week from 85 to LFR is pretty slow. As I said before, if you buy gear from the AH, it will take a few hours to get done with LFR.  But even if you take the normal route, I know several people that did LFR the day after they hit 85, just by running dungeons to get geared.
Like I said, *some* women can go without makeup, or a lot less makeup. These are the exception, rather than the rule.
"I'm sorry, we can't show this content in your area".
it absolutely does matter
The first part, I know the Ouya staff have already confirmed. They're consulting with NVidia to see how much performance they can squeeze out of the Tegra3 without the conventional power limitations of a mobile device.  The rest of it... I dunno, guess Julie will have to answer tomorrow.
I say you're not rational because the only points you provide to back up your argument are fallacies, fully addressed and corrected without any contest by you. I'm not trying to win, I'm trying to discuss. You make it a competition like we're always taught to here in America, and withdraw to save face.  The American public is so indoctrinated that whenever anybody goes against the mainstream core values of this country for the purpose of analyzing and improving, people shut down and won't talk because they don't have the facts and don't want to admit they've been duped. We've all been scammed, myself included, and that's okay... only if we have the strength to acknowledge our shortcomings and work to improve.  You should care to argue, that's the only way people improve. Or, simply enjoy having your human rights violated by TSA and the US govt  for the rest of your life. You absolutely care about all this because you post in /r/politics. And stop picking battles you know you can win, and escaping those you can't. Own up, we all have room for improvement, and argument is the solution.
No, this only annoys the cat.
Me. The OP. Evidently. 
Oh, and I like your handle.  :)
Rabbit ~~Rebux~~ Redux gave me the heebies for some reason. More standard scary is Crime and Punsihment. Something about watching a sympathetic character plan and execute a murder freaked me out. An Occurance at Owl Creek Bridge and The Lottery for short stories. Even more than Poe although the Tell Tale Heart is pretty freaking creepy.
Dominic Cruz all the way, the dude is such an innovator. His footwork, shoulder rolling, use of angles, hell, even his breathing techniques are so unique for MMA, no one else fights even remotely the same way he does.  I have a thing for the cerebral fighters, the guys who really apply their mind to the fight game.
No, you are opening yourself to tax evasion charges on money that you are trying to claim that was "won", and if you have over 10,000 you are admitting to having an undeclared overseas account which is illegal.  (Notice foreign refunds will be administered by PokerStars, but US accounts have to go thru the DOJ).
I agree that moving on is usually the healthiest option, but there's a part of me that thinks they're both giving up too easy. When you're young, you make rash decisions and say things you might not necessarily mean when things get scary and emotional. Look at you and I, love. I got scared and broke up with you....a few times ;) It wasn't because I wanted it to be over. I was just scared and reacted poorly. You didn't give up and neither did I and look at us now. I don't know these people so I'm only going off my own experiences here. He's trying to be in her life again. That's gotta mean something, right? Maybe he just misses her and can't let go, or maybe he's realized what a big mistake he's made. I think she should give him another shot, if only just to find out where his head is at so she doesn't have to wonder and live a life full of "what if...".
We have the multiplayer assets for batarian and vorcha characters. Plus, Mark Meer voices all the vorcha, so getting him to voice one more should not be too much trouble.
I asked my instructor why we wore black instead of white. His response, "It hides dirt better"
Dorm, classes, on-campus job, and parties. But I must say working on-campus was one of the ways to not only meet people but see the most random things.
The leveling was very good, the pvp was sub par and the end game was sub par from what I hear. I never once attempted end game raids.   Point stands.....F2P wont improve these things.
Many? I've never seen a single one. You live in Hackney or something?
Yes, people always seem to default to Connery when asked who the best Bond is because he's the original... But he's not. Ian Fleming's Bond is the original and Craig is the only one who represents him perfectly. The classy thug who is smart but doesn't pull punches. He really represents the books well, which is why Casino Royale was so great. It was like they were saying we are starting from scratch and going back to the roots by doing the first book. Not that I don't enjoy the other Bonds, I grew up watching all of them, but Craig is definitely my favorite.
You are pretty damn sexy you know!
We need to be paid somehow
So basically Prince is a talented asshole...and since he is an icon and some people who are also famous revere him it is no big deal. Great.
TOR is designed to be used by people who are in countries that censor and monitor parts of the internet. Plus, torrent traffic fucks up their system, so it's generally frowned upon. It's for oppressed people in Asia/Middle East, not Americans who want to pirate Batman.  Also, it is VERY slow, because they route traffic through several nodes before it gets to you. Use PeerBlock or PeerGuardian if you're worried.
I was an engineer in a construction site meeting with all the foremen and someone mentioned liking those little seashell-shaped french cakes, at which point I started talking about the madeleines in Proust's *À la recherche du temps perdu* and it got really quiet.
It's not laziness; it's paranoia. I fear that I may have made a mistake at some point and will need to go back and fix it. Coupled with my hatred of redoing things I have already done it results in constant saving.
hank was a bit of a jerk but it's great that my views of him are changing as walt get's more evil
But Starbuck is a girls name.
Please Sign this Petition.   http://www.change.org/petitions/president-obama-stop-the-genocide-in-burma-provide-humanitarian-assistance-to-refugees   The picture at 3:34 was not in Burma. It was accidentally put in there.
You have to understand, the New Testament does mention the devil, so saying the Old Testament mentions the devil would make sense if you're Christian.  Jews, however, who subscribe only to the Old Testament, generally do not say there is a devil.  Also, the word "Satan" is used in the Old Testament, but it is not the devil that most people think of.  "Satan" means adversary, but "Satan" in the Old Testament is not a fallen angel; it is not the devil.
These are freaking adorable! I'm trying to get my hands on the sprinkles set. 
Bookkeeper, controller. 
This is a sad day in Amerikkka. Kent State is all that comes to mind here, except when it happened back then, people were outraged. Now all the zombies think this is the new norm. The upcoming generations are screwed. 
And yet, Mormons are proud of the fact that their own knowledge prevents them from believing in other religions...
&gt;But,^but,^but,  Dat grammar.
What happened?
The hammer is his penis.
any support that kills people like Blitz or Leona since they just make plays and snowball  if the enemy support buys a ward you just kill them since they're behind items and would be too scared to fight a 2v2 since they don't want to lose the 400g they just spent  not really, i hit 2k as support then stopped playing unless mashme wanted to duoq, then i carried him to 2600
As a man, no.
Actually, I think you'll find it is YOU who needs to learn to take jokes, since y'all keep coming up in here to complain about OUR jokes.  [](/dinobenned)
I tend to have to go into the office on weekends when servers go down. So one weekend I headed up to the office and took my dog with me because the office is large and she can run around. I pulled up and there was another car there I had never seen. Figured it was someone picking up their stuff because we were moving out.  I walk in and my dog takes off towards the other side of the office (she normally goes right to my office) so I follow her. I don't see anyone and then she starts running to the conference room.  I look over to see my coworker very freaked out and started to walk over (thought he was stealing something) walked in on his wife half naked trying to get dressed as fast as she can. I turned around and tried to walk away quickly telling my dog to follow me. She wouldn't but I kept walking and calling her. She finally came running after me and they left as fast as they could.  He got laid off 2 days later so we never had to face each other after that.  TL;DR - My dog cock blocked a coworker at the office.
Upvote for Bisbee.
the implication being this sign is ridiculous...especially at a 6...and that I want badly for a bus of cats to exist. [Thought that was fairly obvious](http://i.imgur.com/QmB50.gif).
Sure. You can pretty much say the same with regards to just about any profession, buddy. 
If you create a law saying that anyone capable of entering a contract (i.e. anyone over 18) can marry anyone else capable of entering a contract, then it would be possible for a father to marry his 18-year-old daughter. This is the essence of my post. I don't see how it's not relevant.  Nobody is talking about "creating a favorable class." I have absolutely no idea where you're getting that from. We are talking about what the law should be. If the law were changed to conform to what HarryWaters is suggesting, then a father would be able to marry his 18-year-old daughter.  I'm not sure how to make this any clearer. It's possible that you're just referring to a different post than I am. Simply put, you still have not explained how my argument - that, under HarryWater's proposed regime, a father and 18-year-old daughter would be able to marry - is not absolutely true. You still have not explained how my argument is a straw man.
&gt; How animals act is irrelevant to how humans ought to act. This should be obvious.  Hey, I'm not the one who invoked the "natural order".  &gt;Since two men or two women are not ordered by God to be capable of full natural unity through sexual relations  Explain? The sentence just doesn't make much sense. I'm getting the impression from the following sentence as well that "order" and "unity" have special biblical definitions here, especially since all biological evidence indicates unity (in any typical sense) is indeed possible with homosexual relationships.  So it would appear that you're taking the option of using the literal text of the bible as substantiation- my question then wouldn't concern infertile couples as it would concern *any* sexual act between married couples which wasn't initiated with the intent to procreate. By your definition, having sex with one's partner outside of the monthly cycle of fertility would be sinful, unless both partners were completely unaware of the timing of said cycle.  Your argument that preventing same sex marriages saves people from spiritual harm is fallacious- you seem to accept that homosexuality itself is a natural state, so why do you think that a homosexual in a heterosexual marriage would be any more likely to *want* to procreate with his or her ill-fitting partner? The sex in such a relationship would essentially be serving the purpose of conformity, not procreation, and would therefore be equally sinful. Not to mention that, again, I have yet to see any evidence that marriage facilitates sex. I know that it ostensibly facilitates sex *for Catholics*, but I encourage you to take other ideologies into consideration when pondering nation-or-worldwide principles like this.  &gt;A problem with your three cases is that none of them consider the moral imperative of helping others to achieve salvation.  Actually, I believe that would fall under the second case- "literal interpretation of scripture". In which case you're doing a rather poor job picking that one passage to make a fuss over, while doubtless violating countless others yourself.  &gt;Turning the other cheek would probably be a good option here.  Correct, that would have been the right thing for Cathy to do. Having demonstrated that he doesn't respect such a gesture, it would seem rather fruitless to direct it towards him.
Okay...?
There's a pretty big gap in your logic. You're saying we need to ban people from selling a product because a corporation could commit fraud? Why don't we prosecute *fraud* instead of prosecuting the *product*?  I mean, you could take this argument anywhere. We need to ban Windex because someone could sell it as Gatorade? Is that really your argument?
No, dude, if she was the love of your life, you'd want her to be happy. You'd accept that she was with someone else, *not you*, and move on. You wouldn't be sitting in some corner, rubbing your hands together and waiting for her to break up with her boyfriend after "seeing the light" and realizing that she deserves "so much better." That's selfishness and entitlement, not love.
Nice post but wait for day time next time, buddy
I died.
http://i.imgur.com/Layk8.jpg
I know that they have some sort of tooth stain at costume stores, that creates the black effect in between teeth.  But this looks more like [prosthetics](http://imgur.com/8Msv1) 
I don't see the humor in this.. 
21263
[](/ajugh) I feel like I'm being too proud.
I love this. Sikh people have so much pride in themselves and are highly respected. As one sikh told me, you will never find a beggar who is sikh. Hardworking and just good all around people.
That showed him!
I think her name is [Erin Leigh](http://curvylamp.tumblr.com/post/21361542961/erinleighisme-someone-come-rub-my-bellyyy). And yes, there is plenty more where that came from.
It's easier to get answers but that doesn't mean this is the right place for it.  If I want to find something Zelda related or to discuss it I'm not going to r/games first.  I'll go to the right subreddit, the being r/Zelda.  If I get nothing there then maybe I'll go to r/ games, but that's only because the appropriate subreddit isn't being used appropriately, like OP is suggesting.  
Okay - that's fair enough.  "/u/Yeargdribble is annoyed" is in some way neutral, perhaps I could have said "justifiably" annoyed.  creeps creep is a weak pun on the subject of the dress.
Where? I must investigate this.
OH GOD PROBENDING VS GRIFBALL  I had a hard enough time letting down ender's game, pod racing, pokemon, quidditch, blernsball, and deathball... but grifball? Oh man :( Sorry Sarge, I hope Grif forgot the ammo this time.
Law Abiding Citizen was pretty good. Snatch a classic, have not seen tombstone.
Just...do.  At this point I'd be more worried about *hiding* the fact for 5 years than about about the actual bisexuality.  So when you tell her/him, explain why you didn't do it sooner ( you were unsure?), but tell them that this is an important part of yourself and this is why you're telling her now. Also *emphasize that you're not sharing this information because you want to sleep with other people.* Make sure they understands this doesn't change anything about the relationship. Giver them the chance to ask you questions and answer them to the best of your ability...good luck.
I love how our greatest ally is full of stuck up assholes.
Wanna trade grandmas?
The facts are CO2 ppm in the atmosphere is up, it's a green house (energy storing) gas in out atmosphere. It will effect all climate on the planet, adding energy to storms and heat to the entire planet. Will the Antarctic disappear? No. Will we never have snow again? Of course. More than likely it will lead to a larger tropics area, and the subtropic zones will move further toward the poles. This will change a lot of the local weather patterns effecting people.   Maybe you think this is a good thing, maybe you think it's bad. I think we should try to leave the planet as close to how it is already, and stop adding to the green house gas problem. 
Exactly. It's not even ironically funny, it's just shit and cliche
Looks cool! Never seen/heard of this before. I might have a hard time spending $40 on a keychain though.
He didn't even know her name and he said he loved her. That makes him creepy. She's normal for reacting that way. Go fuck yourself.
No problem! I need work on expressing myself over the internet anyway...
The Clubber's Bubbler
Zelda
Wallace and Gromit
It's removed. What did it said? 
it's not
Please.  The planet doesn't need our help in causing species to go extinct.  Over 99% all of species to ever exist on Earth are now extinct.  We weren't around for 98% of that.
Thank you. Someone with some sense that can understand that very fit women will look "skinny". I'm not saying all skinny people are healthy but a lot of them are. 
I can also do that. People find it to be mind blowing. 
Well, Reddit, for one.  I believe it is called pseudonymous.   
"The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common. They don't alter their views to fit the facts. They alter the facts to fit their views which can be very uncomfortable if you happen to be one of the facts that needs altering."  — Fourth Doctor
And I thought I was smart for a second :(
That's his happy face!
Reading through these posts I have noticed a recurring theme among some of the more, so to say, conservative posters. That being, is homosexuality is accepted within a society, the society will grow up lewd and immoral, sexual beings who experiment and who "choose" to be gay or bi.  This brings me to a point that has always bothered me: if you are so discontented by the sexual attitude of society, then maybe you shouldn't allow society to teach your children sexual attitudes. Be open and frank with your children about sex from a young age. Teach them the many benefits of having a "Christian" point of view about sex and sexuality. Remind them often to respect their body as a wonderful gift from God and teach them that it is a thing of beauty, not to be ashamed of, as well.  Sorry about the spiel. This is mostly a lovechild of my annoyance with the debate on how society is blaming schools for "only teaching abstinence", when I thought it was the parent's job anyways...
I agree with this advice. Try to start a conversation about it. Do your best to frame it using "I feel" language. "I feel like you don't have any interest in most things I do." I get the impression that he won't be very responsive to requests of that nature but it's worth trying. This relationship doesn't seem like one that will last too much longer with such a lack of mutual respect. 
Unless we don't lose a game until then!!!
&gt;Just as being anti-gay bigots represents a large faction of the religions,   A LIE  &gt;just as accepting child pedophilia is a part of Catholicism,  Another LIE
If I didn't have a girlfriend I would so make this my desktop background. Can't believe this picture exists.
[I imagine it would have gone down like this.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jranzFKhZcw#t=1m51s)
www.reddit.com/r/Throwers 
It saddens me that many many people (especially Americans) literally believe this. Considering the thread of the US chick in r/australia the other day regarding moving here she legitimately thought these things were true.  She literally thought we go to the shops and purchase our groceries and say to the clerk "Thanks cunt!". A lot of people abroad don't realise cunt is still highly offensive in Australia (unless you're some mega huge bogan). Some of us might say it to our mates (I say it very rarely).  Our American brethren are unfortunately very un-worldly, and Reddit is one of the avenues where we can actually break stereotypes and show how we actually are. But nope, we carry the dumb stereotypes by going around saying "Fuckin' straya cunt!" and some don't even understand this as a joke.  tl;dr the whole "cunt" thing doesn't do us any help and makes us look silly
And you can download things in FLAC format. Fuck you, iTunes and your stupid m4a.
[The Pink Panther](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HhHwnrlZRus)
This is my first time owning a corgi puppy as well and these tips will do wonders. May I ask what size crate/kennel you have for your puppy?
Did this to my roommate's 2-year-old a few weeks ago. Had her going from one end of the house to the other. Priceless
Bear definitely. Sharks could die on land, which the bear can use to his advantage.
they have a bigger set with the Orange and some other colors but not really my style
I wish I had as much time as you do to play. IP cost is more of an issue for those of us who play 1-3 matches per day
Nice. I have that figure on my desk right now. One of my favourites.
Why do you need to send him something on the internet, if he has the internet?
Me that too
I'm going to pass around tampons in class all day long now.
Thanks, and I guess it works better for some than others, but If it really worked as good as some people say, It should be more popular.
[Partied way to hard](http://i.imgur.com/3b4f8.gif)
Good thing [spoiler](#s "he's dead") or this analogy wouldn't have worked!
Leo Laporte, I have been waiting for this day for a while.  Questions first; praise later.  1. If you could promote one thing that you are doing right now what would it be?  2. If you could promote one thing that someone else completely unaffiliated with you is doing right now what would it be?  3. How have you monetised TWIT.TV?  What earns you the most money to keep operations running? 4. What are your top costs that caused the recent forced downsizing of some of your minor shows like This Week in Science?  Should you regain footing would you consider bringing them back?  5. All preferences and ideal situations aside, what devices and programs do you use on a daily basis?  6. All hypotheticals aside, what devices do you recommend on a daily basis more than others and for what reasons?  7. What went through your head when your mother was your first caller on Call for Help?  I understand some of these are pretty invasive so I understand if you would want to skip some of them.  The Praise: I have been watching your media since 2003.  You helped sculpt how I deal with tech support in my profession now.  I am currently an Officer in the US Army Reserve Signal Corps and I get to deal with angry non-tech people on a daily basis when on the job dealing with extremely complex networking concepts.  As an entrepreneur myself, you have motivated me with your leadership and willingness to take the risks in your market.  You are the future of media.  I still have not forgiven G4 for what they did to your show.  I halved my watching of that network when it happened.  Thank you for everything you do and keep it up!
Not sure exactly where you mean, but it doesn't surprise me. Arkaden isn't known for having decent spawns. Can't list the number of times I wish I'd spawn somewhere else.
All I was saying is that finding the source isn't always as easy as you make it sound.
And the pic is filtered through Instagram, lolz
An epic adventure! Very enjoyable, please do more.
My shopping list looks like: * Eggs, bacon * Organic salsa * Fish, Steak, organic sausages with no preservatives * Heavy cream, real butter * Kale, spinach, * Frozen blueberries * Walnuts, almonds  I'm boring though, I pretty much eat the same thing every day.  And I hate cooking, so I pretty much only get things I can make in a pan as a one-off. 
So there are people who don't hear this stuff?
deism is the last step toward atheism........keep going
You are most certainly a better man than me. I sincerely wish you the best. I hope everything in the future works out in your favor.
How did game 1 end?
[Current price of tea in china](http://supertart.com/priceofteainchina/index.php) 
This makes me feel good, considering I'm working on my MA in TESL.
[Insert Sob Story Here]   Stormy!
I searched the video in the searchbar and it came up to the submit button as it does when a link hasn't been submitted so yeah, man. Happens. No need to be harsh.
"You shall never, ever catch a virus on a Apple, but you could still afford a doctor if you bought a pc."
Why not?  It keeps a list of who owns vehicles.
That'll form an esker :D
I guess they're low compared to tech companies, but not to manufacturing firms. The margins are very low on hard drives.
How could I best do that? She means the world to me, and I know she wants to find a way out. I know it's almost selfish on my part, but I wouldn't be able to handle her being gone.  I'm so sorry, I don't know what you've been through, but you're in my prayers. 
Can you offer more insight on the [departure of Erik Lanigan?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iHQ0fLN63UE). If I was to take this at face value, it seems pretty unjust to remove him if it really was as a result of him being ignored by you, despite you claiming to have groomed him. Perhaps there is a side to the story you would like to share in response to this?
Environmental and all regulations could and would be handled at the state level if you absolutely needed them. With the exception of some well established and important federal ones that have come over the years. (I don't have a problem with the civil rights act, etc.) But the state ones would probably be subject to influence and bought just like the current federal ones. Corporations couldn't hide behind departments and regulations that they've influenced and bought and paid for. Example, if they are poisoning the local water supply they are subject to criminal penalties associated with basic human and property rights and would go to jail. (Same way if I came over and poisoned your water). Rather than pay a fine or a slap on the wrist from the EPA.  &gt;no worker rights and no guarantee of equality under the law  Where you get this idea blows my mind. Libertarians believe unions have the right to organize and they could and would (especially if the people running companies are so terrible as you believe). The bill of rights and constitution guarantees our basic set of rights. How would there be no equality under the law? That's an outrageous comment. Please explain.   You know I use to be a very liberal guy(could argue I still am), was a registered democrat and voted for Obama in 08. After constant disappointments with him and listening to Ron Paul in the debates I've done alot of reading and research on libertarianism and to me personally it makes sense, has the best parts of both parties combined, and is just something different. I would ask that you take a little time to do your own reading (browsing /r/libertarian would be a great start) and come to your own opinions and conclusions. And unlike what this link and hardcore progressives will tell you, their philosophy is far from hostile towards yours. Progressives and libertarians both see the same problems, they just offer different solutions. If we could at least start working together on the shit we agree with (ending war and prohibition) and stop demonizing each other we can get some work done.   
&gt; Even liquid hydrogen only contains 1/4 of the hydrogen that gasoline does per litre (yes you read that correctly).  Maybe I'm missing something obvious here, but...what?
//Simón Bolívar was the liberator and essential founder of venezuela so Chavez bases his policy off of his ideals. It's pretty unique to Venezuela the same way the option is to Georgia Tech. This is actually one of the better ones on here.
That's fucking awesome.
It was boring. Why are you not talking?
That's the one.  I was at a summer camp and one of the counselors decided to tell us scary stories one night around the campfire before bedtime.  Very picturesque.  Anyways, he must have been a theatre major or something because he told these stories with such enthusiasm that we were all on the edges of our seat when he yelled and flashed this picture at us very suddenly.  The kid in front of me fainted. 
To be fair some positioned things are safe if you prepare them correctly.  In the forest I think he mistake the plant, prepared it wrong, and got a rash. So in the city, they prepared it properly, and it makes good tea.  Just my 2c
Nope. A camera would require at least 2.5 seconds of open shutter to let in enough light to get that kind of light from the stars, which means that the people would have to remain perfectly still for at least 2.5 seconds, otherwise they'd just look like moving blurs.
whoa... whoa.... ur a girl? daaaamn.... could still be cute though lol
The B&amp;W which is the bar at the best western center city, which is near the art museum. The scene is lame, however. 
My Alan Wake Franchise + The Darkness 2 + sweet for your Darksiders 2 + Witcher 2   Alan Wake Franchise include: Alan Wake, Alan Wake Collector's Edition Extras, Alan Wake's American Nightmare Ver en la tienda
I geuss just go to the free section and say its yours if you can haul it. No work on your part and you did a good deed. For money maybe donate blood or plasma or a part time job.
A bear walks into a bar and says to the bartender "What've you got to....................................... drink?" The bartender asks "What's up with the big pause?" Bear says "What these? Born with 'em."
You can have as many Jupiters as you like (or as many as your computer/the program supports).
A Peruvian master's candidate for a degree in Computer Science. He set up an account because he thought that I would like it.
Well, I don't know, honestly. My belief about theories of everything is this: Every theory that explains everything we see is a theory of everything up until the day when we realize that we weren't seeing everything.  So the idea is this: we can never be sure that tomorrow we'll make another measurement that will disprove our theories, even if they look very much "correct" at the moment.
Of course you do, everyone does.
Remember, a lot more people will be trying to knife in that game type which will make it tougher to get the accolade.
Wait a minute...so literally anybody could practically live there? And with no questions asked? That is the epitome of human kindness.
What is disputed is the moral relevance of that "medical fact".
*"Now, a leading scientist suggests that her genes were fundamentally altered through suffering starvation as a teenager in the Nazi-occupied Netherlands. "*  So she was mutated by hunger?   I stopped reading at that point. 
Happened to me once while I was in the army. Broad daylight, middle of the afternoon, regular volume, voice calling my name except a bit childlike. It was so convincing I thought my unit-mates were calling me until I found out I was the only person in the building.
I still have a crush on Matthew Perry for that role.
That's a shame.  I'd like to have seen her in this.
I think the WELL (http://www.housing.vt.edu/llc/communities/well.php) is still in there this year. I lived in that themed housing when it was in WAJ. Nice group of people, and a wonderful community. I know several people still in it. If you ever feel lonely or wanting things to do they would probably welcome you to join in. I am super duper glad I did themed housing. It made my college experience so much better, and I felt my hall was super close. I made so many life long friends there. I really recommend going up there to check things out every now and then. I think that is the 4th floor. So the rooms are pretty tiny though. You will also want box fans (2). Maybe even a smaller room fan too. As for the noise. It depends on your neighbors. The hall really doesn't have much to do with it unless you are in specific (themed) housing or one of the really nice dorms. Most likely you'll be able to get sleep as long as you aren't the world's lightest sleeper. If people are too loud after midnight (that's a reasonable time on week nights, but not weekends. Weekends I'd say 2 am) then maybe ask them to be a little more quiet or ask an RA on duty for help. But nobody likes a party-pooper either, so don't be a jerk about either. Your RA will have a sign outside their door saying who the RA on duty is and where you can find them. You may have to knock on their door, but it is their job to help you. Dorm living is different for everyone. Just use common sense. You can't really change too much about your circumstances now, so it is best not to worry yourself to death.   In addition, Newman has a pretty good location. You will be outside Hokie Grill, Owens, the library, Squires, War Memorial Gym, and the Graduate Life Center. The new dining hall is across the drill field on that general side of campus behind west end, so you are closer to it than many other dorms are other than the corps cadets' dorms. It does suck if you have classes in Litton reeves or want to go to McComas. But hey this is VT and our campus is huge so get used to walking and enjoy the beautiful scenery that only Blacksburg has to offer.   What floor are you on by the way? When my boyfriend lived there over the summer we thought we would have to move crap up stairs because he was on floor one. WRONG there is a basement level where the parking lot lead to. 
Pretty much this.
6th grade? I was that "cute" kid, so I had a bunch of meaningless relationships from 10-15 with girls who thought I was so afflicted.  I guess that puts me at like 10. Damn that sounds young. As for your other questions -  It didn't last long. Honestly, 10 years later, all I can remember of it is that we held hands at the lunch table (which was supposedly illegal in the lunch-aids' eyes) and our version of breaking up was forgetting that we were together over the summer. Literally. We both forgot.  I felt like a cool kid, having a pretty girlfriend. It really wasn't necessary, and I don't think anyone really cared too much.  I don't remember how it came to be though, really I don't. It was 6th grade!!  Our only issue was that she was a tad aggressive socially, and it made me feel sort of small.   I could certainly give you more valuable information were you to ask about more current relations.
I hope you end up in prison with some thug of a prison bull doing this to you daily. Just for a joke, of course. I'm sure the other prisoners will find it hilarious.
As he hints? Balls up and take him down now.
...you're aware there is like 10 photos after that pic right?
Hahahahaha whoops
I don't like it either. The same reason I don't like Geodude... 
Yeah I think just having David Mitchell having a debate with politicians/experts around a table would have been better. 
then it was definitely the banks fault who got the whole loan   not the broker who told the guy that housing never goes down (especially in popular areas like arizona and the inland empire) and that the buyer should think about the cash out refi he can get because the house will appreciate 15% year over year  and then its definitely not the fault because the buyer didnt know what he was reading and said hey i can get 15% yearly if i take the lowest payment selection on the option-arm mortgage im signing right now with my "eh its alright" credit history
And to reference the words of ODB "Uhhuhu huuuwuuu wuuuhhuuuw"
I'll never boo a player in Giants uniform. If I'm unhappy or upset, I bite my tongue. So welcome Pence, he's a Giant now and we shall show him why we're the best fans in MLB. 
You, are the only smart person here.
(Verb) the (noun) is always a good structure for ban names.
Way to strawman!  Why would you dare try to imply I would think denying gays the right to marry would be okay if it's done by a majority?  Oh yeah, because I corrected your misuse of the word "authoritarianism" and you got butthurt so you tried to distract attention away from your mistake by putting words in my mouth.  Did you see me advocating a purely direct-democracy style of government?  No, you didn't.  We use democratic constitutional republics (instead of direct democracy) for a reason.  You can take that stawman and shove it up your ass.  By the way, Tyranny of the Majority is a problem that can occur in any Democracy (direct or representative).  It's not an argument for (nor against) Libertarianism, Liberalism, or Conservatism.
Because he's being a butt. How many users does Reddit have? Yeah, some things are going to be repeated. Heck, some things bear repeating. You shouldn't feel bad, you're fine. =]
I'm not saying either game is better, just that call of duty has more players...
Accept challenge.  Prepare for karma.
Isn't it just banned_players.txt and banned_ips.txt?
A girl from my High School, Elizabeth Beisel just won a silver medal in the 400m swim. Pretty epic if I do say so myself. 
ifixit.com.  Maybe a little bit on the pricy side, but all their products are top-notch.
Also, the beverage server may have been by, but the zombie slot player didn't look away from their machine long enough to notice they were being offered a drink.   Beverage server on a casino floor is not an enviable position.
Rainbow Dash, we all know that underneath that bucking badass exterior, you are warm and squishy.
The Wikipedia page on "Genderqueer" isn't perfect, but will probably give you a clue:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Genderqueer
I killed all three. XD
Hey Leo! I'm a huge fan of TWiT and even watched a bit of TechTV when I was younger!  Some of your newer shows are really looking great! (have you checked out /r/knowhow or /r/byb?! :D )  * Do you think you've created some thing with the TWiT Network that recreates the atmosphere of TechTV? Is there anything that hasn't carried over to TWiT?  * You're very open about the interworkings of TWiT and your personal life. Does that ever come back to bite you?   * As a younger viewer I sometimes feel like I'm not in your target demographic. What is TWiT doing to draw in or cater to a younger audience?  Thanks for doing this!
He's thinking, "[Aww it likes me](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PL5W2begvIo)".
Road was pretty rough, which caused the street lights to be distorted. 
Look how many fucks he gives.  It's the same as the percent chance he'll survive when he crashes.
I once tried to make mustard gas with instructions from some website, but all I got were these stupid crystals.
I understand minecraft isn't very realistic in some ways, but getting thrown backwards because you shot a bow doesn't make any sense. Now if you were shooting a cannon then it would make sense, but anything really short of a cannon will not make you move backwards in real life why would a bow make you go backwards in a game?  The arrow is so light in comparison to you that you feel little recoil from a bow, nowhere near enough to make you lose your footing in anyway unless it was a hand held balista.
http://cleveland.sbnation.com/cleveland-browns/2011/11/4/2538708/peyton-hillis-status-attitude  He was a huge detriment to the environment of a team that was desperately in need of something positive for a change. There is a reason the Browns let him go
The elephant is like thats right bitch this my pool now
At :44 Ronnie cops a quick feel.
Will look into this!
damn that sucks you didn't get away with it!
You mean Chanandler Bong.
I was on 900mg of lithium. I was given fluids, morphine, and promethazine. Also a shot of benadryl because i swore i had hives and was scratching my skin. I was there for a few hours and levels tested. Then was sent home with pain killers and promethazine.... The side effects lasted a few days after. I apparently would cry for hours at a time and also went suicidal on it.  I take 15mg abilify and been on it since May. Been on this dose a month. Been on Wellbutrin a month as well. 150 xl. Wellbutrin upset my stomach at first but i love it. I have been way better on this combo and 25lbs lighter. Abilify stole my appetite.
Couldn't sleep :/
I agree with the others that acoustic treatments can help a lot. However, it is not cheap and many people find them to be aesthetically objectionable. Go to [RealTraps](http://www.realtraps.com/index.htm) to see the type of thing we are talking about. There is a lot of good information on that site if you dig a bit. If you don't want to go this route though you can still get good sound.  NHT is a well known brand in the audiophile community. They make great speakers. That said you have a lot of good options in your price range. The best thing that you could do would be to go out to local hi-fi dealers and listen to speakers in person. People have differing tastes in what sounds good to them. There is no guarantee that you will like what others like.  If auditioning in person isn't an option for you than I would look at ordering from an internet direct company that offers an in home trial period. NHT does offer a 30 day in home trial and they even pay return shipping so you are good there. However, since you focus is on music I would take a step up to the NHT Classic series. You can get a 5.0 system with the Classic Fours as your mains for about $3100. The Fours have built in subs so living in an apartment I wouldn't even and a sub to the system.  Other internet direct manufacturers that are worth a consideration:  [Ascend Acoustics](http://www.ascendacoustics.com/pages/products/speakers/SRM1/srm1.html) - A 5.0 of their Sierra bookshelf speakers would run about $2050 but you would need to get stands for the mains at least.  [Salk Sound](http://www.salksound.com/songseries%20speakers.htm) - 5.0 of thier Song series would run about $3200  [Swan HiVi](http://www.swanspeaker.com/product/htm/view.asp?id=249) - Not actually an internet direct company, but you can get a 30 day home trial through [audioadvisor](http://www.theaudioinsider.com/product_info.php?p=swan-diva-6-2-floorstanding-loudspeaker&amp;products_id=29&amp;) who is an authorized dealer. You could get a 5.0 with the Diva 6.2f as mains for $2160.  This all still leaves a fair bit in the budget for the receiver. If it were me I would probably get an [Emotiva](http://emotiva.com/) pre/pro and amp, which should run around $1300.
I would guess the guy who cleaned up after people who jumped off of buildings was always working.
Looks Awesome
It sounds very strange, and very Korean. It's expected of k-pop groups... but it's not necessarily a good thing. It sounds very strange to my ears.
Legit?
I hate myself for not living in mass. and being able to vote for her.  Warren really is the best thing since sliced bread.
Fantastic game! I'm pretty sure I got everything... I know I got the unlimited battery life, so I think I got to be the ultimate chibi-robo or something like that.  I never did like the ds game though. I just didn't get that same feeling of scope. There's something really cool about climbing navigating a giant house that a park just doesn't seem to capture.
I just realized how much of a void is going to be left behind when this show is over. I might actually cry.
No pain when I touch the bone.  Depending on how recently I've run the pain I experience is localized to a specific location, but I only feel it when I put my weight on the leg in a certain way. Going to the doctor on Friday to see what he or she says.  Aren't all shin splints stress fractures though?  Just different levels of severity? 
I think the real question is If the machine gun in episode 1 is for a)Hank b)Jesse c)Mike or d)All of the above 
Don't stuff your muff with crazy
*cue battle theme**
Honestly, these trades doesn't make sense at all, I need to cancel a trade to trade another pokemon? Were we done? what was the last pokemon I saw? xD
Haha. Yupp. We are all ready to hit up Student Legal Services.   I have heard so many horror stories. People who had to spend a week cleaning their own house before it was even livable.  We even had to call the fire department on them for TWO code violations that they refused to correct.
[](/happyluna) Do tell!
If I did that, my lungs would close up and I would die from asphyxiation. 
Stupidity, I'll edit.
I don't know about that. I think we fans who have lost faith are perfectly justified, considering how this team has been an embarrassment to watch play for almost a decade.
I loved Ready Player One. I had a ton of fun reading it. I was able to meet Ernie Cline on his book tour so yeah, I'm a total fan. 
Well, I'm a firefighter/EMT by career, so I can handle all first aid matters. As for fortifying the shelter, the building we're looking at is a 2 level 'office' building.  It operates 24 hrs as a non profit organization, so if anything happens it'll be abandoned almost immediately.  There's long tables that can be used to secure windows/doors, worst case scenario destroy the stairs. Because it operates 24/7, there's bedrooms, kitchens, a first aid office, and other supplies/rooms that can be made useful for any lengthy occupation.   
the monarch sanctuary is in the state of Michoacan, Mexico...i've yet to go but i've heard it's breathtaking. 
you didnt miss out
[Because AP items often give MR](http://leagueoflegends.wikia.com/wiki/Magic_resistance).  Edit: These items are more often used by assassins than pure casters, but you get the idea.
What did the fish say when he ran into a wall?  Dam.
Large scale pot farms can fund gangs. I am guessing the victims of these gangs think it's a victimless crime too...
I don't worry too much about the multitude of reasons why people just downvote stuff and provide no context for it. I certainly don't take it personally.   But like you said, the shape is not even an elaborate shape. I can't imagine how the guy got it wrong. 
:)
How the hell does a dog turn into a lion?
I currently swim with the Blue Dolphins and here's my take. (+) Friendly, nice group of people. (+) Large range of abilities. There are people learning the basic strokes, to former college people. (+) Varied workouts. Usually: Mon IM, Wed Distance, Friday Sprints. Fastest lane is doing 3,000-3,800/hour. (+) Convient practice times/locations (M,W,F) 6-7AM, 7-8AM, Tues PM @ UIC, Sunday AM @ UIC.  (-) We just lost our pool contract for weekday AM at Moody Bible Institute and the coach doesn't have a new one lined up at this time. (-) Coach Fitz spends more time at the swim studio (most likely where he makes his money) then at the practices. Normally there are 2 college-age people at practice. They are friendly and will gladly help you with technique if you ask. I've read the Yelp reviews for Blue Dolphins and there are a few really negative one because people didn't ask for help. I've vastly improved my flip turns, backstroke, and breast (weakest) because I specifically asked for help.  Recommended? Yes, but there might be a big change coming up at the end of August when we no longer have a slot at the Moody Bible Institute pool for M-F 6-8AM practice.
when the wheeled cart with  the huge monitor on it   rolled into Science...
All I've ever wanted is to look like myself. And now I do. :)
Judo just makes it more interesting. It's a martial art. Your neighbor could probably out grapple you!
The total war series has an excellent still active modding community as  well. Some mods can easily add hundreds of hours of game play. 
I do understand that, but do you know if you call them up that they will tell you that it is. It was a huge pandemonium a while back. 
I'll echo what others have said about you just playing word games to try to get the answer you like. There is no right and wrong in buddhism, we are to look at every situation and see what will cause the least suffering. Depending on your interpretation of karma and rebirth, you'll have different views of suicide and euthanasia. I'd also like to point out that death does not lead to peace and enlightenment. These are experiences and, in your view, death is the absence of experiences. But mainly I'd like to say that there are other ways out of depression that you probably haven't tried. For example, Ketamine has been shown to instantly cure depression in some cases. I actually used methoxetamine to cure my own depression (that was dumb, I should have gotten help, but it worked). I'm just saying that you don't need to throw away hope of getting better.
###GOOD WITHOUT GOD
what is that building with the angry Jack Skellington head on top?
I think I always take the intended meaning over what the person actually says. So if someone says you're so tall it will mean more or less depending on what I think the person saying it means.   So compliments that mean nothing to me are the ones that I sense mean nothing to the person saying them.
Thanks so much :)!
I'll offer either Dead Space, STORM: Frontline Nation, Psychonauts or choice of two from (S.P.A.Z., Sanctum or Defense Grid: The Awakening). Also have a Borderlands GOTY key, if you can add a bit more. 
A German artist named Otto Dix used to paint these fellas.  [here's](http://imgur.com/h9AEy) an example 
Yes
yaay thats great news, all i want now is that curse makes an irc channel, i guess most people hate the twitch and own3d chat´s cuz the players dont look at them, atleast on owned :p
Pretty sure it was in Morocco
lucky
how much do u have saved up  &lt;
Yes... Yes, it is. Cosmo is a hilariously bad source for sex advice and I knew that when I was 15.
I've read a variety of places over the last couple of months that the Fed, Congress and The President, have largely done what they're able to do to affect the markets.  I don't know how accurate those articles were, but the implication from them is that it's entirely up to the economy now rather than legislative action.  
Only when under the influence psilocybin.
I mean, I wear makeup every day, but I certainly don't think I look disgusting without it. That wouldn't be a particularly healthy mindset in most cases, IMO.   That said, I almost never go out in public without makeup. I don't care if my friends/boyfriend/landlord/FedEx guy see me without makeup on, but my grandmother (who is the most fabulous woman ever) taught me that a lady never leaves the house looking anything less than her best. 
Thanks for laying this all out clearly. Although I think your opinion managed to sneak in there, you've still gone a long way to at least presenting one side of the argument.   &gt;In 2012 Dan Cathy publicly states "Well, guilty as charged," when asked about the company's position. “We are very much supportive of the family — the biblical definition of the family unit.” And then **eluded** to it being Adam and Eve not Adam and Steve."  By the way, the word you're looking for here is 'alluded.' :)
Build Minecraft inside of Minecraft.
Single handed sailing on that scale is exciting and scary at the same time. I am more of a "shared experience" kind of guy, and I'd love to do something like that, but only with (the right!!!) company.
wht has the world become to?
I would have liked to make a giant foot squashing the camouflage fellas a la month python but I don't have any skills. Anybody got the skills? 
&gt; Now if we could just figure out a way to REALLY fix it.  Spending more money on science and education than we do on the military would be a great start.
That would fall under the whole "when necessary" part wouldn't it
  [Screenshot](http://screenshot.freshphase.org/simpleview/xh73g) | [HTML Mirror](http://screenshot.freshphase.org/mirror/www.reddit.com/r/mylittlepony/comments/xg5xe/a_teaser_image_for_our_game_what_do_you_guys/c5m3glq.html)  ^[About](http://screenshot.freshphase.org/pages/)  [^( AD: Check out the SRD Twitter Bot)](https://twitter.com/SRDBot)   
Shows him for being athletic and tan. That bastard.
  Your submission was removed because your post is more appropriate for r/casualIAMA. Thank you.  
Pretty successful day. Most people just swipe it. Thumbs up for good samaritans!
I don't know if I'm too late to join this conversation but could you maybe explain the differences between the different implications of being idealized, as opposed to being fetishized? Or what it would look like if men of color are idealized rather than fetishized? Would you categorize scally porn as fetishized white guys? Any other examples?  I'm just curious because this distinction is a new one that I've yet to come across.
Read the FAQ
It's a bit of a weird place, kind of tourist attraction but not. Interesting to go though.  Yes, longest station name in the UK definitely, perhaps Europe.
Its a trap!
&gt; Of course context is important, and the context of this discussion is "a serious romantic relationship with another person," where your history/personal details are extremely relevant.  Uh, no, you made a general statement about how trans people should behave if they want to avoid unethical behavior, and you did so in fairly vague terms (what's a "casual date", and is "getting serious" a euphemism for sex, or does it only imply a committed relationship...and so on). 
It's relevant because it didn't work.  Snake venom is a mixture of proteins, so either denaturing the protein (typically inviable due to side-effects on the human body) or inactivating the protein are the answers; hence: anti-venom!
Oh this is going to be nice :D
It is pretty good stuff, a tad dirty but I figure the savings you get from the ammo justifies the extra cleaning.
loans are dead last options as interest rates are cut throats.... seek friends...... we'll find out which friends like you   must talk to parents before taking loans, beggars cannot be choosers  on a lighter or darker side, what did you major in ?
And by now they've all lost interest.
[](/dashconfused) Explain...
Wow, that's a new one.  Uhhh...well, other than wandering around wall street and looking at the buildings, there's the museum of american finance down there.  That's about all I've got.
Basically the guy has 2.8 million bucks in campaign money, but wants his 2 bit piker fanbase to subsidize what is essentially a moot point...bringing his delegates to the convention where there is nothing they can do to change the fact that Romney will be the nominee, except bitch and whine like a bunch of epsilon-minuses masquerading as John Galts in their demented heads.   It's funny. The exit polls for the primaries consistently showed the Paulites were in the lowest income brackets. Ron Paul won't be happy until he money bombs them all into taking food stamps from the evil gubment, just like Ayn Rand. Who is John Galt?  
I'd pick air so I could be immortalized as the hero who stopped the villain who brought the world together. 
[Did someone say free pizza?!](http://i.imgur.com/5AwR3.gif)
Barmargha Bleurw, yesh.
Nice.  [Here's](http://i.imgur.com/DhoSG.jpg) my attempt from a couple years ago.  I also only had a few people get the reference.
Ahhh...
Did anyone else *not* like this movie?   Edit: So...I see people did like the movie. Is it wrong to not enjoy it? at least give me a reason before downvoting me.
His journal mentions he didn't believe that conceiving a half-Orc child was even possible, so if anything that just deepens the mystery.  And what about Nord/Imperial or Redgard/Nord or the like? I don't know of any mixed-race kids who aren't half-human and half-mer. (That accounts for the Grey Prince, since Orcs are elves.)
I tagged him on Facebook. This'll confuse the fuck out of everyone. 
Easy: someone who is fiscally conservative and socially liberal, but not into the idea of privatizing everything, getting rid of all taxes, etc. Someone like Gary Johnson I would say. Look into him, he's really not that ridiculous of a guy. He's maybe even more liberal than Obama on gay marriage, but he is in favor of a flat tax system with no lop-holes, for example.
"Everybody is a genius. But if you judge a fish by its ability to climb a tree, it will live its whole life believing that it is stupid." - A. Einstein
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1fgq0DceUkI&amp;t=4m32s
Yep, I don't like gaming on 3 monitors. One monitor for gaming is fine for me. I wanna browse the interwebs while I'm playing a game. Plus I find it hard to work on just one screen.
2 million people dead.  How in the hell isn't ending this conflict the world's number one priority?
I really do...its weird, because this was my first time producing or writing.  So, I was nervous going in. But as soon as we were on set, I knew it was going to be a great time. Spending hundreds of hours in the editing room, I definitely got attached to the project. And now I hope weve created something that others will get attached to as well. I think that most of all I like that im giving myself and others a platform to create.
back in nhl 2k8, they had online leagues AND fantasy drafts.  It wasn't a disaster, just required people to be dedicated for about an hour and pick their guys.  These were actually my favorite leagues since I personally hand picked a team, and was with them till the end so it just felt more involved.  EA's excuse is simply that they didn't feel like adding it, or plan to add it another year.  Edit: It was actually 2k8 that I played with online leagues, not 2k10.  Although that game had them too.  The drafting could also be done via console OR website, as they had a top notch website for each league set up
I really like your choice of colors. Is that an actual technical illustration or a demo/intro?
Wtf the bar on the right I swear wasn't there when I posted this, it is there now...
Yeah, pretty common set up in terms of style. Especially with all the GMRpls ComX stuff.   Here's a pic of my 1st line. http://i.imgur.com/UP1mc.jpg
or as i liked to call, "tractice"
The girl is b-e-a-t-i-f-u-l.
Do you think he relates to your weird side, MyWeirdSide?
LOooooooooooooove when my husband orders me to do this. I'm perfectly willing to do it without being told, but the assertiveness is so boss.
So presets? How much apparel is there? Lots im guessing? 
Raid dungeons.
Ask your local council how much they lost, ;) it was not an isolated case, and this is just the council. It does not mention the other entities that are semi council run, IIRC the figure is supposed to be closer to 40 Million.
He isn't pissing the english off that badly, we just think he is pretty funny and silly, which is much worse for his reputation.
Your argument is invalid because cat.
Its just a sticker. 
Wishing harm on *anyone* isn't an opinion, it's sociopath-territory my friend. 
Yeah, but then you weren't doing a butt grab. My point was this person probably couldn't have stood up.
The problem, however, is that /r/circlejerk doesn't allow pictures, thus no karma for the OP. It's pretty clear that's what the OP wants.
Ugh.
Hey, I'm just saying we see post all the time that say "this has nothing to do with atheism." just trying to keep us on topic lol -_-
Whoops, forgot to make the second post I promised.  ---  Same-sex parenting:  Gay and lesbian parents are consistently shown by research to be as capable as heterosexual parents. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LGBT_parenting (the wiki article cites seven mostly academic sources so you can copy those)  ---  Homophobia and mental health:  30-40% of gay, lesbian, and bisexual youth under 21 years old have attempted suicide. This represents about a threefold increase in suicide attempts when you restrict to sexual orientation minorities. http://www.sprc.org/sites/sprc.org/files/library/SPRC_LGBT_Youth.pdf  About 20% of LGBT youth in the USA are homeless. http://www.nationalhomeless.org/factsheets/lgbtq.html  The 20% number is likely a low estimate, since pressure is always AGAINST outing yourself. Some studies report numbers as high as 40% for LGBT homelesness. LGBT people comprise between 30 and 43 percent of clients served by homelessness outreach programs. This is awful, but not all that surprising, given the abundance of stories of LGBT youth being kicked out of their homes after coming out. http://williamsinstitute.law.ucla.edu/wp-content/uploads/Durso-Gates-LGBT-Homeless-Youth-Survey-July-2012.pdf  (When you compound LGBT and homelessness, you get even HIGHER rates of suicide attempts, up to 53%) http://www.jahonline.org/article/0197-0070(91)90080-6/abstract  In states that passed amendments banning same-sex marriage, rates of psychiatric disorders among LGBT individuals increased measurably after the ban. In the case of generalized anxiety disorder, the increase was about 250%. http://ajph.aphapublications.org/doi/abs/10.2105/AJPH.2009.168815  ---  Conversion therapy:  Conversion therapies have been determined to be ineffective and to pose a harm to the health and even life of their victims. http://new.paho.org/hq/index.php?option=com_content&amp;task=view&amp;id=6803&amp;Itemid=1926  Recently the president of a leading Ex-gay organization, Exodus International, revoked his opinions on reparative therapy, saying in no uncertain terms that there is no cure for homosexuality, that the promise of such (as typified by Exodus International's slogan "change is possible") gives false hope, and that such therapies can even be harmful. http://www.nytimes.com/2012/07/07/us/a-leaders-renunciation-of-ex-gay-tenets-causes-a-schism.html?_r=1&amp;pagewanted=all  ---  (Edit: formatting)
Google it. I was at work at the time and on my way out so I quickly gave a description. If you find anything let me know. All I know is I have used waxy maize recently and notice better recovery. Whether it is placebo or not I am not sure. All I know is the stuff is cheap enough to not care.
Please help me understand 'government censorship.'  When does that apply?  So, with private censorship, we can say whatever we'd like, but if we are wrong about a person then we can be sued if they suffer damages.  Did I understand you correctly?  (and thanks)
When I swapped jobs almost 2yrs ago, my starting salary was about $90k. It is really hard to answer your question because the starting number will vary depending upon where you live in the US. There are some good websites out there like glassdoor.com that show what people's salaries are in certain job descriptions. It also really depends upon the company (e.g. start-up vs. medium-sized company vs. established big pharma company). In general I'd say probably anywhere from $70k+ - although it could be less if it is hospital oriented or academia. Also, if you were planning on doing a post-doc, that won't be much more than 30-40k/yr I think... but don't quote me on that. I really don't know since I won't be doing one. Hope that helps! Note: Edited to add in starting salary.
To be honest, i'm not sure how to pick out a PSU.  Any recommendations there?
Because it's outside the map.. it shouldn't be there, and people shouldn't put them there simple.
This is the most economical and logical response. Bloody brilliant sir, here, take an upboat.
lol, so sensitive.  
Annie explains it: "I may have been distracted by Britta's pronunciation of the word bagel."  
Cool story bro.
Actually, I couldn't get past the first episode. BUT BUT!! When I did, I was instantly hooked. I'm a horror buff. I love horror and the whole episode, to me, is this turning of the typical girl in the alley. 
You're very welcome ;) Hope to see more of you... Something such as face, your beautiful smile ;)
As a guy who follows him on twitter, it's irritating to see each and every one of his tweets karma farmed here on reddit. 
That's pretty lame, though, since not only were Batman's parents killed, but also the girl he was crushing on, in comparison to Spiderman's one uncle.  
I don't know why. But i've always turned against teams from where i live. I like to have a small portion of my friends root with me. 
Segues or taking human names from syllables found in a Pokemon's name.  For example:  Charizard -&gt; Charles  Hypno -&gt; Sleep -&gt; Doze -&gt; Dozer  Poliwrath -&gt; Poli -&gt; Pauly  Golem -&gt; Rock -&gt; Rocco  Arcanine -&gt; Fire -&gt; Arcade Fire -&gt; Arcade  Crap like that.
Your username would suggest otherwise.
Holy shit, awesome! Quick question though: do you feel as though your diet from 3 weeks out had a large impact on your appearance? I see the photos, but it can be hard to tell sometimes. How did you feel during/after it? Do you feel as though the look you had during the photoshoot is sustainable?  I ask because I remember a thread from a couple months ago where someone here on fittit tried out the Ultimate Diet. He looked awesome in the after shot, but he said he didn't think he could sustain it. I'm interested in your opinion.
Nah, I'm not entertaining your opinion. It was fuckin funny though LOL
I just went and read up on the symptoms of chlorine poisoning, some are very similar to swim bladder disease.  While unlikely that I forgot to dechlorinate, I'll admit it's possible.  If I don't have the remaining fish die, I'll have to assume your guess may be the correct one.  Thanks.
Congratulations, [here is your commemorative plaque](http://i.minus.com/ibvXBuq7fNnfvY.png), as requested by our fellow gentleman, Grizzant!
Hey Leo! I love TWiT, great job! What was one of your favorite moments that happened back in the old TechTV days? Either on air or off...
Not sure if I should downvote because I'm angry or upvote for the info...
17 r4@//¥ 15
It's nice to see Rush getting some respect at Rolling Stone. As for DT, I like some of their stuff, but they aren't like Rush, where I can listen to any of their stuff any time. I have to be in the right mood. Oddly, Rush is the only prog rock band that is like that. I like the classics like ELP, Genesis, and King Crimson, but it's hit or miss for me. I've never been able to get into the newer bands like The Mars Volta or Coheed and Cambria.   Edit: Forgot to say Yes is about the only other prog rock band I can listen to anytime and I like most of their stuff.
I love cigarette company freebies. So far I've gotten a keychain and a water bottle from L&amp;M. Looking forward to the coasters!
[Cristians?](http://espn.go.com/mlb/player/stats/_/id/4025/cristian-guzman)
i don't have it yet, im waiting for delivery on a couple of copies. I will PM you when they turn up if thats ok?
I saw the ambulance take someone away, don't know if anyone died. They are chalking up the place now, marking dropped shells and taking photos.
yeah, I definitely feel bad for the teachers hospitalized while doing their normal work, or the ones that are relocated across the country/world and don't get to see their loved ones. Clearly that's the same as lower wages and dealing with shitty students.
That's one scary iraqnid.
No, you are a bully.  You have no authority over me other than the threat of violence you use to force your agenda.  By your logic, stupid logic, really, you should have left the country when Bush was in charge because I bet you didn't like the way he ran things.  people do not have to abandon the lives they have built for themselves because you want to be a tyrant.  Leave me and my property alone and I will do the same for you.  Why is that so offensive?
That was the joke
Get out. 
In michigan
Unopened packaging idea is a very good solution to the reasonable suspicion problem. I would completely agree to having the same sort of penalties for marijuana intoxication while driving as alcohol intoxication while driving.
&gt; Competition   *chuckles*
You rang?
Hmm... bit of a disparity there with the ERA's... 
Thanks!
If you can get past the fact that it's the most useless pyro primary, phlog is actually a pretty useful weapon.  Edit: Do not take this seriously.
Fury of the Wild by Hammerfall
What do you do for a living that you can drop 1500 dollars on a piece of equipment.
My gmail is first initial, last name.  And some girl kept signing up for stuff using my email address because her first initial and last name were the same.
&gt;they're going to need to improve on their three point shooting  So basically, we're fucked. 
They won't get the first Crysis games to consoles. That takes too much time and money, and I think they'll be coming with a sort of sequel soon. I'm craving for it..
Solid work
Lots of 2200 elo players charge 20-80$ per hour. =D
leo are you here 
I'm a 5' 2" male on my path to swole-nation.  Please consider making large LRB for the vertically challeneged.  Stay swole
Ahhh, you're right, you're right.  I've heard of that link between fat cells and delayed male puberty/feminization before. I guess I just didn't connect the dots well enough here.
I haven't lived there but I've walked around there at all hours of the night and never had a single problem. I feel much safer around there than, say, South Oakland. 
Braces are a life saver! 
gotta think about it :)
If this goes to live, I am immediately going DK with friends, and juggling people in BGs all day long.
&gt; all of this assumes the weapons have equal DPS, which is obviously not the case.  This part is pretty important.  Can you redo your visualization with this taken into account?  Just do a search at 1mil gold and grab the 5th highest DPS from the top.
I just think it's funny that those are both in a high school year book
Plus he was voted in more than twice, if you count the elections he won: 1968, 1972, 1974, 1980. 
&gt; one wrong word and I could have put him off vag for life.  Haha, he'd prob be grossed out for a little bit, but forget all about it when he got horny again.
Ooh, good spot! I was hoping for a Mars like planet (or anything I can send rovers to really).
To avoid mold in the future, it's best not to uncover the jar until you're ready to bottle it, and sanitize everything that touched the SCOBY with distilled vinegar, if you didn't do that already. 
Actually, pikachu learns rain dance.   http://bulbapedia.bulbagarden.net/wiki/Pikachu
I was at a theatre seeing the first Batman remake with Michael Keaton, maybe around 1988 I think. Sitting in my seat with a large coke, I lift it up off the ground by the lid and as soon as it's over my lap the lid comes off and the whole thing dumps on me. Sat through the movie anyways.  At Avatar on opening night, screen goes black with 2 minutes left in the movie and we all missed the ending. Sold out theatre was not impressed.. after such an epic movie it was painful...   Edit: year
Double fuck.
`Within the Discworld series.`
This deserves so many more upvotes. I really love what it portrays! You hold totally go ahead and make a little comi about it; add colour!
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 4 months | [IrelevntElephnt](/user/IrelevntElephnt) | [Oh Tim, you silly goose!](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/qew9z/oh_tim_you_silly_goose/) | [/r/gaming](/r/gaming) | 370 | 1692 4 months | [xAsianZombie](/user/xAsianZombie) | [Interesting.](http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/r2qqz/interesting/) | [/r/gaming](/r/gaming) | 68 | 1076 4 months | [Greenspyder7](/user/Greenspyder7) | [It also falls on all the gods](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/qpgyx/it_also_falls_on_all_the_gods/) | [/r/atheism](/r/atheism) | 104 | 920 * See **8 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/pics/comments/xh0oj/kill_it_with_fire/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id xh0oj&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/xh0oj/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id xh0oj&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/xh0oj/\) 'Help me grow')
Great stuff. This should be on the sidebar.
I too came here to say this exact thing.
Spent all morning on campus setting up SSH into my home computer.
Half Life 2 for Audiosurf?
SHAME ON YOU!
&gt;The one solace I've always found in situations like this is that her true colors have been exposed.  Dear everyone: never forget this. Never pass up an opportunity to realize that when someone *almost* fooled you, that they've probably succeeded more times than you'll ever know.
Am I the only one who finds I annoying when people try to say, "being unhealthy is fine as long as you feel good about yourself!" Don't get me wrong, unhealthy means being too skinny or too fat. But come on! Even for males, you shouldn't be complacent! Workout, and get in shape! And stop telling people that it's ok to live unhealthy lifestyles!
NBC's us-centric spin is aggravating.
yea thats what i thought as soon as i died i might try it again sometime
Just remember: We work to live. We Never live to work! We Must always live to love.  :)  Hope you slept well. 
I liked the worm games, but I wasn't a fan of the 3D games they've released. It doesn't have the same feel as the 2D series, and is harder to control for me. 
Isn't some genius on this thread, that can track this idiot by his license plate, so we all can work out a motherfucking I double dare you Gooby please and rape him shit revenge plan?  This is just a perfect example, what makes us humans look like arrogant, stupid and blind species.   So let's get it on, I am willing to do a lot so justice will be served. *mwhahaha*
Up voted for 225 up votes. 
Actually exists...have already posted the link like 5 times from this post lol
[](/derpyhappy) Yes we did.
Pelican puke?
I do research EVERYTHING i spend my money on. that doesn't mean its not fucked up when a person in retail takes advantage of someone who doesn't  do their research to make a "sale" and my point isn't really about that is it? its about someone who sees something WRONG being done and then doesn't do anything about about it to preserve their place at the work environment or the world at large. personally I would never be able to live with myself if i "kept my mouth shut" to fucking keep my job while outright wrong is going on. but do as you feel is right and i will do the same. your the one that has to live with yourself not me.  edit* I don't give a rats ass about up votes or down votes
:D
You must be high.
Kate Beckinsale, and still number one in my book. Though Emma Watson with long hair makes a strong competition. Followed by Rachel McAdams.
Awesome
Not many do, save the uber rich. I have a friend who paid all cash on the spot for his Aventador. It's beautiful. Gunmetal grey color. 
Her, but thanks. It's not really fun when that happens... I always sucked at geography :P
Do you know how long it takes to develop a phone? I don't, but I imagine it's longer than a month.
Where's your American patriotism?! Why do we watch the Olympics and cheer for the American gymnastic team? Because fuck China that's why!
At least is isn't thrice.
I do believe you could have doubled the awesome quotient with a 'meep meeep!'
The biggest complaint about Dale's RV isn't so much the lack of security or the living accommodations but the smell of feet and ass. How do plan on dealing with that? 
[](/aj00 "Of course it was!") Was it good?
Alex Jones had the story in mid July, during record breaking heat throughout most of the lower 48, thousands of ppl were being held in communal cells without air conditioning   &gt;Understand the same process, by which the Department of Homeland Security, left the gates of the New Orleans Superdome locked, whence thousands of ppl who had sought shelter there during Hurricane Katrina, were left to die  Will be counted as a crime against humanity, no less than abortion and euthanasia genocide, and the outrageous crimes being perpetrated in prisons, similarly throughout the Lower 48  And in Alaska and Hawaii, and in the hundreds of illegal and secret prisons world wide, financed, operated, maintained and staffed, by the same Ziomossad apparatus that attacked the US on 911  That is waging illegal and unjust war across the globe in alleged reprisal, while the same Ziomossad apparatus arranged the assassination of President Kennedy, whence the Martin Luther Kings man and wife, were in a snipers nest on the Grassy Knoll  And Kennedy's aversion to US participation in Vietnam, was overturned by Lyndon Johnson Vice President at the time of the assassination, similarly like the Luther Kings knee deep in blood
Ok I put my xbox live name as deadman17and0 and I kind of regret it because I have to go and pay for it to get it changed. This is just unbelievable, couldn't you just put THE STREAK!?! 
It definitely does. And we don't always catch ourselves doing it, either. I'm just now getting used to the idea that I can wear a dress or a skirt and it's not a bad thing and it doesn't make me any less of a scientist. It's very freeing in the summer, what with the extra breeze and all.
http://i.imgur.com/p8NOO.jpg
what a disgusting piece of shit. i really hope this asshole is found- charged and publicly shamed. 
I like making [this](http://maps.google.com/maps?saddr=Reagan+Airport,+Arlington,+VA&amp;daddr=Mount+Vernon,+VA&amp;hl=en&amp;ll=38.781922,-77.062912&amp;spn=0.226684,0.528374&amp;sll=38.764792,-76.993904&amp;sspn=0.226739,0.528374&amp;geocode=FSHLUAId6XFo-yGtawdtAa9oQSmV4C9AMbe3iTGtawdtAa9oQQ%3BFVakTgIdCMBn-yEMImoDG3MnVynjBfJulq63iTEMImoDG3MnVw&amp;oq=mt+vernon&amp;dirflg=b&amp;mra=ls&amp;t=m&amp;z=12&amp;lci=bike) a loop 
Like the previous just said you can't avoid the pain, because the more you try the more it stings. Face it, deal with it, talk to your friends for support, if it gets too bad go see a therapist. But whatever you do don't run.
Using double sided razors is definitely worth it. You can buy a crap load of blades for cheap. Change it often and you always have a brand new edge.
Because some users like memes, and while I may hate them, this is a forum for the users to decide on their own content.  If the users collectively vote to ban memes, I will gladly ban each and every one.  The second we operate with "it's our forum, we'll moderate with impunity as we see fit", the place goes to shit. It's definitely not because we're lazy, I spend hours a week maintaining this subreddit, and I swear I post here at least as much as anyone else.  I would gladly ban all memes if the community decided to communicate that to me. edit: Also, if I recall correctly, when you asked us to ban memes that one time, we encouraged you to make a thread discussing it with the community, and you never did.  Why not do it now?  It seems to be something everyone wants to discuss.  The second we put our foot forward one way or another as a moderator, it almost always skews the perception positively to what we're saying, so I'd prefer the voice come from the community and not from us.
Holy Shit! Its the mom from Carrie!
Funny because there is always that duality of it.  That you lift to gain acceptance and admiration of your peers, then behind your back they scold and mock you for it.  It's a strange little universe sometimes.
Stealing is stealing
I am currently giving you a virtual hug
I said that over and over again with the gif
Ah, I see! I had read it that you were suggesting the OP's post might be fake or something along those lines.
No there aren't. To begin with there are shelter beds for fewer than 10% of the homeless in Montreal. Does that sound like an excuse to be homeless to you? Tell me about these mythical tons and tons of programs: are there well-funded mental-health and addiction-recovery initiatives that they just didn't tell those of us doing streetwork about? 
"bestof" doesn't have to mean "good."  The 'bestof' post I read was pointing women to it as a defense against his tactics. Forewarned is forearmed.
Then I'd have to leave the house!  Where there's PEOPLE!  Annoying, obnoxious judgmental people!  Seriously though, I just dont really enjoy the theater experience anymore unless it is something special... like say... the upcoming Hobbit film.
Can i get info /URL for your company? 
Smaller consolation prizes sound pretty good to me, but that's just my opinion. 
"Fuck 'n' A John" -My Father
Somebody should pose as a shadow enthusiast and ask the suspected thief what area they're from/if they want to ride sometime. Find out victim's area then if it's close enough, bam. Reasonable suspicion and rightful cause for an investigation. 
[TP!](http://i.minus.com/iH8aOpXstddxg.gif)
Hate to get meta, but there are just as many people circle jerking about calling this a circle jerk.  If you don't like it, I'd suggest providing some reasons, and add something to the discussion.  For example, people suggest that the context would be negative. The context could just as easily be he was growing for a medical dispensary that got raided by the federal government. 
Yeah, you sound really well-informed and completely unbias.  &gt;And they both have hamstrung scientific progress as much as possible to be in line with their 2000-year-old desert religion.   You are aware that the Catholic Church [accepts the theory of evolution](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Catholic_Church_and_evolution), yes? And also that it was a [Catholic priest](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Georges_Lema%C3%AEtre) who first theorized The Big Bang, something that the Church as a whole also accepts?  But hey, don't let my facts get in the way of your unbounded bashing! You're on a role :)
Science has told us there is more doors.  If one fails to understand, and simply assumes anything, you have created thoughts with no reasonable basis, and probably false.
Sone people have all the luck. The only two item drops I've had were a super stun gun and a wolves coat. :/
Was it laying under your bed or something? Lol I still have mine from way back when, paper is coming off a little bit
[SAO spoilers](/s "Dual wielding itself may not require the skill itself but then what is the point? You can't use the system assist when attacking so it makes them much weaker than not dual wielding.") Well, I don't really want to keep on rambling when I haven't even fully finished reading the LN.
And most of all, RELAX.  Being stiff is what gets you in to potato chip mode.
1) 21 female  2) 18 iirc  3) I was at a concert and I saw some people smoking weed. I knew my boyfriend smoked and I asked him if he would introduce me to pot.  4) Yes. My family is very relaxed about pot use and I don't really have a complex about doing things that aren't allowed anyway so it was not 'forbidden fruit'.  5) LSD MDMA mushrooms cannabis amphetamines (illegal at the time, now prescribed for legitimate medical reasons) cocaine ketamine mxe opiates (in the form of prescription painkillers) DMT 2-cb 25-i and various other research chemicals.  6) Cannabis, other than that it varies but I usually trip on LSD or shrooms about once every month.  7) No  8) N/A  9) Yes  10) No
Chickenfoot.  Cryogenic Suspension Chamber  EMP bomb  Eggplant Pie
But, I don't want to be sexy! I want to be FABULOUS! [](/rarityfabulous)
What are you going to tell your kids when they ask about the lamp? Personally, I'd go with Jesus made it out of water, it's a classic(,) and it works very well on children. 
Ur awesome. I might have to hit you up one day.
But "im" is a negative prefix meaning "not". ;-;
Rasmussen, always polling the *narrative.*  It's these kinds of organizations that are driving this nation into the ground.
past 30 days: .359, 19 runs, 6 homeruns, 16 rbi.  You and your league must be inbred'  edit: And he just hit a grand slam.  Sucks to suck, huh?
Make it work on a 5x5 iconoclast layout, including the dock, and I will love you forever
You're a Mac... Gamer? Did you not see the problem with that? I have nothing against you using a Mac, but that's like setting up a solar power plant in Britain, then wondering why you keep having backouts.
[Here's](http://www.petapixel.com/2012/07/31/canons-drool-worthy-gear-room-at-the-london-olympics/) a link with better resolution and an estimated worth in the comments:  &gt;So from just the 2 racks of bodies I can see, i count 5 rows and in each column 7 deep. So that's 35 bodies on each shelf, I see 6 shelves visible, so that's 210 bodies per entire rack. Clearly at least 2 racks, so 2 racks we get a minimum of 420 bodies. That's not even factoring there is more then 2 racks, since we only see 2. So at retail price estimate at $6,800 (each) x420 bodies that's $2,856,000.00 just in bodies! WOW!!!  &gt;I don't even know where to begin with the lenses, too many variables and unseen shelves/racks. Anyone want to guess the total retail value of that room? Given the low estimate $2.9M in bodies, I'd say at least $9-11M USD!!!
wow, if all cops were like that then I would almost be happy to get pulled over for speeding
awesome idea! And please make it in Black and Red, just like the black and orange phantom, but red instead of orange. would fit so well in my room :D
10.6.8; bought mountain lion a while ago but I still haven't received it ...
This. If he'd said Congolese, that may have been acceptable. Regardless if his later opinions, this is undeniably racist.  Also... Che did not have a Protestant upbringing, and certainly wasn't Protestant later on. Hard-working is a Protestant value, as it later became a communist value. Claiming "black culture" can't brook such a value is close-minded. Claiming there is a single "black culture" bespeaks atrocious ignorance, even before racism.
Wait what....? Which one of our members? o.O  Edit: I asked Insert, you meant Rhaisteld aka Tom. He's on Isaac's team, not Insert's. 
Did anyone see this video in the recommandations? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NRoug-HKdKQ&amp;feature=relmfu
"The people who will torrent no matter what are the people who just wouldn't buy the songs/albums if torrenting wasn't a option."  I disagree. I definitely would have a lot less music in my library/on my iPod, but I'd still buy music from artists I really like.
What's the difference between posting them on Facebook or Instagram? Especially if someones instagram connects to FB.  Seriously, Suck it up.
Which buttons are you talking about?
Some do,some don't,some are undecided.
Editorialized headline.
I'm tryna win this here contest, yo.
Don't worry, it doesn't get any better when you're married.
That explains it. Well... guess I'd better put on my [10]foil hat and enjoy haha.
Wow, that's a great resource - thank you!  If you'd be willing to take a couple of pics of those bits, that would be great! 
Yeah, but they're Charger DB's...
Not really sure what I was thinking.  Oh well, can't edit titles.
This is what I never understand when people level criticism at the fact that they're buddy-buddy. Like don't you, as a student, realize that it's ultimately in your best interest if the key stakeholders of the well-renowned institution you attend to know the other key stakeholders of well-renowned institutions in the area? Don't you realize that hob-knobbing with other executives is one of the necessary "evils" of a major power-house in a state with other large competing interests (not other universities necessarily--I'm talking about competition with other non-educational entities for local, state, and federal money).
I want:-)
Alternatively, Night on Bald Mountain by Mussorgsky.
I'm nobodies mother. [It'll all be so deceiving.](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/126/055/lied.gif?1306191204)
Jesus fucking Christ! I hope they going to get put away for this. Noble of you, but....... kinda stupid too, sorry bro. Get well soon!
Oh yeah? Well my MP7 With Thermal/Silencer will completely steamroll your pitiful ACR.
can we as the Internet use lawyers to sue this company? IE the people vs asswipe company?
&gt;redditor for 27 minutes  &gt;for 27 minutes  &gt;27 minutes  &gt;minutes  &gt;s
I know a few that do almost entirely therapy, but I know far more that do like, say, 2-3 days a week of private practice, half or more of which might be primarily therapy. I do know plenty that do practically no therapy as well.
It's great, but make sure you get the second edition. In the first one the Greyjoys were way to overpowered and it was pretty much impossible to play as Lannisters.
&gt;So, you resorted to your iPad, because the submit button wasn't working on your computer?  Wow, your reading comprehension is second to none, you must be a fucking genius or something.
Well the way I see it they make money based on the customers they serve. Itd be a lot like insurance now that I think about it
because gender != sex, the two domains don't have to correspond with each other. brains do all kinds of things, and one of those things is sometimes making you have a gender that doesn't have a physical analogue. 
There's something very homoerotic about this all.. 
Helson Shark diver.  There's a 42 and 45 millimeter version. How big is your wrist? Take a piece of string and wrap it around your wrist and mark where it over laps. Then measure. It will be easier to give suggestions if you tell us your wrist size.
[Yeah he did...](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1R2r8FxmQn8&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player)
Because Jersey Mikes is crazy expensive. That's around $15 right there. 
http://lifehacker.com/5930437/how-an-american-can-stream-the-bbcs-official-olympics-coverage-and-overcome-nbcfail
Not really.  They're more like NPCs in an elder scrolls game.
Being trampled on and treated like second class citizens in the country that you were born and brought up in, the country that your parents were brought up in and even further back is justification for hating the race that is doing the trampling.
Same issue. I couldnt get it out at first. I needed to stick something in there to "re-click" it and make it come out
Nice! Haha(: you should add me on skype
I can't remember, what was the reference?
Really? I've never seen anyone label themselves as autistic. However I cam see that it is very present with other disabilitys e.g OCD (Jesus Christ this one annoys me), dyslexea and dyspraxia 
Any PewDiePie fans out there? :D
also have ice crystal bow
True. A felony means squat when you are 12. Unless you are in Texas, then you are getting the chair.
I like the billycock name, thanks a lot! The fez is a bet meh, though.... all your other names I've seen are really cool though! Any ideas for a strange YER?
Alright let me know if you're still interested, I have a few trades pending for some of the stuff on my list but maybe we can make a deal. 
Ever heard of Apple? 
... Touché.
Yay! 
Or the stock Android mail app trying incorrect passwords repeatedly. Seen that too many times, too!
[We even have the same name.](http://i.imgur.com/2Wk9I.jpg)
I am currently reading quicker than the eye.  Any anthology by Bradbury or Vonnegut is top notch.  I also read an anthology by various authors on dystopian societies in the future.  It blew my mind.  It was called brave new worlds.  http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/1597802212
That's one of the worst meme's Ive seen and Ive seen a ton of them.
Speaking as ex-Air Force, I was stationed on Okinawa, and we certainly noticed that the younger Marine Corps members there had "issues" totally out of proportion to their population on the island.  While I was there, at least one beach had posted signs saying, "No Marines under E4 unaccompanied by family".   One of my Marine acquaintances cross trained from the Marines into the Air Force.  He said it was partly because there were no jobs for a machine gunner in the civilian world, and partly because, "The Corps makes me crazy!"  He once lost his shit because a civilian had "disrespected him", so he brandished a machete and chased the civilian into a storm drain.  Most of my Marine friends are pretty casual and cool, but for more than a few of them, Marine basic training seems to turn them into idiots.
That woman had a really large penis shaped clitoris...
If you tell others he's a felon, you better be right.   [Defamation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Defamation)
Thank you so much :)!
[Here ya go!](http://imgur.com/bRcf9)
I wounder if I could rent that leopard for a day.  I have a bunch of squirrel bastards in my neighborhood that think my attic belongs to them.  
this movie looks awesome!  since it is a collection of short found footage movies (i.e. trick r treat) I am hoping that it translates just as well.  Based on the trailer though this movie should kill.
Sir.. The n64 is 64 bit !! Or else we'll be callin it n32
["Walk With Me in Hell" - Lamb of God](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qj1ar0Ma_kA)  Preferably starting right after the solo.
I love you Buddy! He enjoys Volcom ice cubes. :)
Nuh-uh.  They're **bad**.  I say we seize their corporate assets (that's not supposed to be a euphemism)!!
I could not have said it better! Roflolz
Why not tell her she's attractive? You did like her, didn't you? :x
Not with a contract. The Galaxy Nexus was free with a contract with most Canadian carriers awhile back. With Canadian carriers though it is better to sign a retentions plan rather than sign for a device upgrade.
In case he doesn't get to answer this one, it depends on the person, destiny doesnt enjoy it compared to other games, idra, and people who are more negative/bm. People who are more positive enjoy playing the game.
Ok. Gotcha!
His observation that SF people always make it a point to let you know how much they hate LA when they find out you live there...so true.
Welcome to the pc master race
Actually all sikh temples provide free food to anybody. 
He said he wants to gain weight.  I said eat more calories than he burns.
That is so funny.
a little jenny is my #1 Fan Girl and im her #1 Fan Boy  idk, lulu is just fun to play even tho i don't think i'm that good on her
This looks like it's going to be absolutely awesome.  I look forward to seeing how it develops!
I'm under the impression this won't happen for several months or so after release - god I can't wait to have all the DUST noobs make me rich from purchasing more and more guns...
Then it's probably one of the following reasons:  * department understaffed  * writer wanted to  * misattributed byline
Professor McGruff was the best history teacher in the school
http://www.wwoof.org/ 
Sorry, got called in to work a bit earlier than usual.  In case you didn't find out in the meantime, yes there are spoilers. I am not sure what the intentions of the writers are, but anything aside from being a passive, subservient wife rustles jimmies across the board.  I can barely go on to /r/breakingbad or /r/thewalkingdead without feeling the hate emanate from my monitor. I was happy to see Anna acknowledge (albeit briefly) that this doe reflects on a culture.  Too often directors, writers, and actors skirt the issue and use the ol' "well, she is not the most likable character" or "well, she is a wonderful actress, making you feel those feelings for the character." I was late to the Six Feet Under party, so I never did get to read much viewer commentary.  That said, what you mentioned doesn't surprise me in the least.  Brenda WAS written to be a supremely complex character.  If a viewer is not able to appreciate Brenda as she is between-the-lines, mental health and all, they deem her the "batshit feeemale," which is this really nebulous, lazy notion I see bandied around far too often when a woman shows any kind of complexity in character (they do with Lori in TWD, also).   
A fantastic shot. Absolutely solid.
I'm up north already. Already geared. Skype?
Does anyone ever have success on PoF? Last time I was there it was pretty bad.
Newb here:  So, what exactly is "freeflying"?  My first guess is that you are no longer tandem jumping.  Do you really have to do 26+ jumps to be able to jump on your own?
Your dad is a legend.
It would be cool if Uribe's belly button caught the ball.
Mostly I was reacting to the awesome tag line "A preview of modern email from Microsoft." Because most of us have no idea what modern email would be like and we need Microsoft to show us.
We had a chance to play Lost Winds and we made a few gameplay videos if anyone wants to check it out: [http://appvidyo.com/lostwinds](http://appvidyo.com/lostwinds)
indeed it's the flag of tibet
Exactly.
Deeja and Jaree-Ra both count as "friends", making them perfect candidates for the Ebony Blade.
Smooth tracks like that penalize lightweight two strokes.  If it was bumpier he would have even done better compared to the heavy four strikes.  What caused the camera lens to get foggy?
may the gods praise thee
I count myself as one.  Sometimes I call myself a dirty hippie commie too.
I get the privilege of playing on the Renard version of that instrument. (Renard 41 is the exact same instrument just a different name). It's kind of a piece of crap. I named him Fawkes. 
Major thanks for proving our generation can grok tech as well as anyone.   Here's a thank you lase. [Link](http://youtu.be/Dg98DOFfIIw)   Also, I often lase a picture of the guest.  But in your case, there are better choices.   Sarah and Amber, for example. [Link](http://youtu.be/6WIdSrMTzgc)
I'm in the U.S.
I'd prefer that you save the money and use it on a vacation instead of a ring
No it doesn't, there are tons of good reasons to like Portal.
I didn't recognize it, but I guessed it was minecraft related.
Role play, dirty talk, watching porn together. All of those things can also bring about new ideas of things to try in the bedroom, too. 
For years I thought that was a Hendrix song. Then I find out it's Bob Dylan. I was like "WTF?! BOB FUCKING DYLAN?!" But it makes sense. I will always enjoy the Hendrix one better, but Bob Dylan was very talented.
Lots of stuff got ruined sadly :(. But we had duct tape!
Slow driving? You've got to be kidding me, Mississippians are the fastest drivers (because there's so much rural area between any of the larger cities). I'm a polite driver but I like to get there in a hurry, I will have to adjust to this.
Time isn't free.  An especially commercially savvy individual's talents are probably better spent on negotiating with other people than doing grunt work which can be farmed out.
Fast running there
Thank you! Is overclocking as risky and difficult as I think it is? I feel like I'll screw up and fry my processor or just not know what I'm doing after watching a few videos.
Also, Pinball Arcade's first DLC is supposed to hit today too. Real tables with good physics, unlike the arcadey-ness of FX2.
I gave a long-winded explanation of it [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/wv9fn/best_laymans_explanation_for_scientific_theory_i/c5gv0r4).
There is a lack of interest in female sports in general, but there isn't a real female football(American)/baseball league. The reason that our male soccer team isn't so hot is that our best athletes are going to go to some other sport first most of the time. The top woman sport could arguably be women's soccer or woman's basketball, and the others have less support from the populace.   So no, soccer isnt viewed as feminine, we just care more about other sports. 
Ask to speak to him alone, tell him to take a walk with you or something one night when it's later in the evening, do it sober and don't think into it too much, you know it needs to be done, and he probably feels the same way in the sense that he's just as afraid to say something but you have to do it!
what the fuck? Seriously?
I picket on /r/atheism all day.  it's much more convenient.  Have you heard the word of the Lord my brother?  Light always conquers darkness.  If this fact angers you, I cannot change what you are.
There is a subreddit for every god damn thing possible.
So does this mean that experiences like "pain" or "sadness", or any other subjective phenomena are not real?   I hate to say it, but you seem to have entirely missed my point. 
Essentially: "Your complimentary tone on Notre Dame football wasn't complimentary enough." Something about greatest fanbase in all sports and then I passed out covered in vomit.
Wouldn't it be better to just not give it traffic?
&gt; ... should be about discussing the topic not discrediting others work.  If the work has no scientific backing, then it is fine to discredit someone's theory. This goes back to our fundamental difference discussed elsewhere: there is a _[very specific definition of the scientific method](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scientific_method)_, and failing to meet that standard, what that video discusses isn't science.  You seem to think that "all viewpoints should be discussed," but in science, the viewpoints are only as strong as the evidence that supports it. Please, I beg of you, _at least understand this part_.  You gave the example of people thinking the Earth was flat. [Anachroisms aside](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flat_Earth#Classical_world_2) (that is, that was overturned _fairly early on_), in the absence of evidence to support the claim, a spherical Earth _shouldn't_ be taken seriously. However, as stated in my link, there is plenty of evidence in the form of seafaring observations to counter the flat earth belief.  &gt; I am just so tired of the know it all attitude in here.  I think you only see that because you adopt the "science doesn't know everything" attitude - and you are right! Everything _isn't_ known. **However**, it doesn't mean any random and baseless speculation or hypothesis should be addressed. _It shouldn't_. If there is a significant enough controversy or uncertainty, you will see that stated.  The requirement for evidence is what separates science from philosophy.
It's kind of difficult, because the first arc makes way more sense if you've read Uncanny X-Force (specifically Deathlok Nation), and the second is the AvX tie-in which doesn't use the SA team and doesn't really have much to do with anything.  Now that Remender's built the foundation for an ongoing SA story though, it should become more accessible. Which is great, because it's definitely been good, just a bit out there.
Facebook login = not even going to take a second look.
Wait with the alcohol until you get to know your roommate (unless you're referring to rubbing alcohol, which is also important). A lot of people moving into the dorm are the "sheltered suburban" type who might rat you out if they're your roommate and they see it.
Hence the "your team sucks"
Did it click? 
PM me, I would be glad to send you a pizza
I actually haven't, but price: 20k tops, range... Doesn't really matter. I can have the car shipped. 
You can move here!
Im confused, isn't Ron Paul a libertarian? Yet Johnson is the one on the ballot? Is this correct?
Honestly, I'd be careful with that, and personally would pay ten dollars to avoid it, but that's just me.  Dunno, I just felt kinda uncomfortable around it, I mean, I have a pebble from the grounds of Auschwitz on the shelf next to me.  I feel better knowing the context, but forgive me if I'm a little uncomfortable about it until I really get used to knowing the story.  This in NO way reflects badly on you, I just need to get used to it.
I've told my story here before. As a child I met a young girl in my church and didn't think anything of her. It wasn't until later that I found out she was a girl who died in a church fire some time in the early 70s. She disappeared and I never saw her again. Then as a teenager I noticed she'd come back once I started going on dates with girls. She never came back in a physical form, but as a spirit. She would terrorize my dates. During college she haunted the girls at my university. Eventually I think she got bored and went away. 
I know everyone's seen this when it went viral on the friendbook six months back, but jeez, this is great work. By Glenn Smith - glennoart.com
She doesn't actually have a blurry face. They blurred it out in editing, I presume, they just forgot to blur the reflection.
Add me on steam neboanex and send me details ill help you out.
ಠ_ಠ
Just noticed watching last week's episode, the books next to Aria's bed are:  * Straitjacket &amp; Tie  * Some book by Bartholomew   * Death by Pantyhose
Do you slander everyone?
would would would would
Igetthatreference.jpg 
/facepalm
If someone said "black people" it would be racist.
Ladies and Gents our first MLS playboy. 
It is common? But I think the guy was a little paranoid about giving the info. 
German here.  I beer all the time.  But sometimes, I wine too.
Makes sense now huh? With my username? I saw that you were friends with 4cubits so I was like HA! I know that guy!
http://themikmik.com/forum.php maybe what youre looking for. Its more HTC specific but may help out
Brian Cranston is everywhere. 
I believe it is released on Waypoint, but the limited editions come with a DVD of it.
&gt;What is one piece of RIM hardware that you consider was well ahead of its time?  Thats a tough question. I would have to say the digitizer on the 9900 series. Very responsive.  &gt;Which do you like better, the paired keyboards with two keys per button, or the harder to press individual keyboards?  Full QWERTY 100% of the way.  &gt;What were your favorite perks about working at RIM?   The large talant pool they have. The people are what make RIM. There is a RIM culture that is just unique to that company that I have never seen anywhere else. The benefits package is AMAZING, and the chance for growth during the good times was fantastic.
what kind of dye did you use? i thought DX plastic was hard to dye.
pff he only went down because he lost courage when the street bike went vertical on a dirt cliff. pussy.
If there's one thing I can't stand looking at for more than two seconds, it's  local fucking news.
That may have been true in the past, but things can change. I can definitely get behind this. I mean hey, if we get a lot of people behind us, it could spread pretty fast. 
They were pretty dominant way back but I just felt like posting this because I never got to experience that. I just remember one losing season after another. I'm hoping for a brighter future and it certainly does seem that way.
There have been comparisons of household income vs household expenditures but they suffer from the same problem as household income, its nearly impossible to account for changes in demographics (falling household size), changes in income profiles (more women are working, women earn less) and the three changes in the way we calculate CPI since 1970.  While personal income is not subject to many of these problems comparing it to a rise in costs is subject to the problem that most living expenses are incurred at the household level not the personal level, how do you account for this?  One "back door" way to look at this problem though is via [RECS](http://www.eia.gov/consumption/residential/). RECS looks at what devices households own based on various types of demographics, including household income. While we can't use this for a direct comparison its useful for understanding how people are doing, people generally don't buy a new tv if they can't afford food, and the trends from this gives an indication of if the amount of true disposable spending power, after basic living expenses, is increasing or decreasing. The two dips in the last 30 years are 90-92 and 07-10 but otherwise all indicators are trending up for all income groups. While we can't use this to definitively state that people "have more money" then they did previously it does show that the purchasing power of those people has increased.
I have a cousin Mike, you're probably him as well eh?
If he'd of tried that near where I live, he probably would of just got glassed inside that first 45 seconds. 
Deer can sometimes walk away from a collision that totals the car... I'd think a bear would be tougher 
MUCH LOVE HOMIE&lt;3
&gt;But, does your government FORCE you to have insurance or else you would be fined?   We don't have insurance, we have taxation (NI is a part of our taxation system). And that is compulsory and we would be fined or jailed if we didn't pay.  &gt;When gov starts to regulate everything regarding health care, the quality of health care will decrease  There is no evidence of that. The many studies that have been conducted have shown the opposite to be true.  &gt;while the millions who need health care will increase.  The number of people who *need* healthcare will not increase. That is a blatantly false statement. The number *needing* healthcare remains the same, it is a constant. The only thing that will increase is the number of people *getting* healthcare.
FUCK! i had a Monroe poster... I'm male
If I could clone myself, I'd have been at one of those games. Instead, I was across the way at Otakon. Sorry we clogged all the food joints.
He was bigger than me, I just took it back at night and never talked to him again.
"Hi daddy! Are you proud of me daddy?" - some random pornstar while she gets dp'ed
What was the girl doing?
He was great (and completely different) in Merlin. 
two incredible pussies
When I was little I met David Attenborough at a small ABC book signing. I said to him "when I grow up, I want to be an ecologist"....and in the delicious voice of his, he leaned down and said "well then that's exactly what you will be" I nearly burst to pieces with the oppression of not being able to leave the building with him, and head to the jungle. I love that man. 
Thanks for replying to my stupid question!
‌‌‌‌‌‌‌‌‌‌
long story short, he just realized that the money he spent, should have been saved for school or other important things. 
I wasn't trying to be exclusive, it was just because that way it directly relates to me, and what I was thinking about. I guess that's a good point!
no worries, mate
I was going for the Admiral Akbar there, but thanks.
Screw it, I pick all three, triplets problem solved.
I bet it's a tough feedback cycle...workout to sustain the sex god fitness level, get more testosterone, have more crazy sex god sex, repeat.  It's a quick trip either to becoming Adonis or dying of an aneurysm.  :P
Ugh, should have known at the first sight of the words "Rolling Stone" that this would be a bullshit list.  I love Dream Theater, I really do, but that #1 spot is not deserved, especially since it's given to neither their best nor most influential/innovative album.  While I appreciate the Rush entries... I'd honestly have been fine with them just putting "Hemispheres" on the list and making room for such influential, important albums as "Hot Rats" by Frank Zappa, "Tarkus" by Emerson, Lake &amp; Palmer... they should have limited it to one really important album per band, and made room for other acts like the above, plus later ones who kept the genre evolving like Marillion and Porcupine Tree.  It's just a shame that a Top 10 list for such a diverse genre is populated by a bunch of albums by the same few bands, some of whom don't even deserve it.  These are all great albums, but... I mean, King Crimson is one of my favorite bands of all time, but, as much as I love it, what did "Red" do for progressive rock that "In the Court" hadn't already?  Hell, as much as I adore it, what did "Scenes from a Memory" do at all?
Here's another one: http://redd.it/xgozu
This is what I tried to explain to her.  She's still sold on "higher cost = better degree = better job".
its intentional..was part of the original design of the course. its called "death valley" much like like valley of sin thats right in front of the 18th green at st andrews. but i do see what you mean about that
Yeah, let's go with that. 
drink lots of water, and take fresh fruit to eat, junk food doesnt make you feel good, even though its what you want
There's a fine line between justice and vengeance.
Katanagatari is in no way a mature anime
You seem very subdued about this whole thing.  Are you just not that into her and sticking around for convenience sake?  I ask because I'm an extremely non trusting person.  If i ever trusted someone enough for marriage and she cheated on me I would be way, WAY past crushed.  There would be no fixing it.  And I certainly wouldn't be as calm as you seem.
My favorite pony... [](/fluttersrs)  Yeah it is definitely fluttershy.  She represents everything I am not, and is the exact polar opposite of me.  Even her clapping is graceful. [](/clop30)  Yeah you see that shit? That's Fluttershy.  Cute huh? Exactly.  Timid right? [](/loveme "FUCK NO")  You come anywhere near this crazy-motherfucker's friends... That's it. The endgame.  [](/cockatrice) OH FUCK ITS A COCKATRICE. WE'RE DOOMED. [](/shywithit "not today,motherfucker")  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XEgkNVCg6iU  See that? See how she defends those goddamn fillies? A fucking natural with kids.   OH FU- BEAR!  [](/z10 "oh shit")  [](/y24 "haha just kidding bitches.") http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fjfeo5hP_GA  When her friends need her, she's there to help. Always.  [](/w03 "like i said, I'm awesome.")  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DLTZctTG6cE
we're such fickle beasts.  it's ok. 
That is a really cool aspect of your faith.
For my son, I would say "if you want to hit something, hit the xylophone/drum" then demonstrate. At that age, hey have the impulse, but not the ability to control it, so we would provide safe ways to allow him to express his frustration the way he needed to. If he wanted to throw in anger, we gave him a ball. If he wanted to bite, we gave him a teething ring. Worked very well, and it was pretty cute to see him start to get upset, and run angrily to his xylophone and bang away at it to release his frustration. The only thing though, never let it slide even once. My boy is 3 now and we never have a problem anymore.
I see you've played knifey-spoony before.
Where are you from? Iv I woke up to a snake this big anywhere in my yard id shit bricks.
This can be reposted as many times as possible, I aint even mad.
I don't necessarily think it's a hipster thing, here in SF it's more of a foodie and au natural thing...at least imho.  Pretty [old article](Bull Moose Hunting Society goes for the kill) about a club here in SF that does this.
:)  There's also a "PS" version with pliers, scissors, but no knife.  Possibly better if you already carry a knife.  
Hotmail uses exchange where available. Sparrow was a bitter disappointment with POP3 only support. 
Correct me if i am wrong but that is a barn owl Right?
If you're going to come here, please do know that passive-aggressively posting about how God is real will not help anyone. All of us live in societies that are over-saturated with messages like that, and it has not yet made an impression on us. If you really want us to change, why not instead ask some honest questions? You cannot change anyone's mind without first understanding how their mind works, and it seems to me like you may have a lot to learn. Regarding your earlier evolution-comment:   Evolution has something to do with atheism because creationists have made it so. This is not a battle we chose to have, it is an attack on science from a subset of religious people, which has mostly been ignored by anyone but biologists and atheists.
guy on right - vagina.
Well, March is too early to qualify.  But for anyone getting this problem and who bought after 6/11, this happened to me - I called AppleCare and they took care of it.
So, why do people downvote stuff like this?   So much darkness in their hearts...
My brother has a pallet jacket ticket...
Can't judges refuse to throw cases out? If a case made it to trial, could a judge tell them "Oh, fuck no you aren't backing out just to come back later! I am making a god damn ruling so i don't have to be back here in 6 months. "
Haha, I've never heard of that device, but I know if I was looking for something like that, that's the place to go.
I wish they would have some of these games in december or January. I'm home for winter break then (I go to school in KC). The other nights I would just have to hope its a weekend when I'm home. Hopefully it works out because I would love to get back to the X. I go to lots of Twins and Timberwolves games since you can get in for cheap. Why is hockey so much more expensive? Not just in MN, but everywhere. The arena is like going to an NBA game, the salaries are similar to the NBA, etc... Can't figure that out
Have you checked into Leapforce or Appen Butler Hill?  For the kind of money you might need, I don't know if just beer money is going to be enough.
It's the punchline of a joke made by comedian Jimmy Carr, answering to the question posed by Cainedbutable above.
Converted to the knuckleball last year after both he and the Indians decided he couldn't make it as a conventional pitcher.  He's sucked every time they promoted him to AAA (albeit a limited sample), so it remains to be seen what happens when he gets promoted with this new weapon.
Laptop, cellphone, hair brush.
We flew. He made it before we got wings using rocket boots, but once we made wings it was a lot more convenient to fly up there.
I'm interested in the coffee table and nightstand and can pick up in an hour email markhardboiled@gmail.com
I was thinking the same thing.
I'm not angry but you're still disagreeing with me.  Why do you need a "Marriage Union" to build a family?  Just build a family.  I'm fine if people want their church to put a special stamp on their life since that doesn't affect me at all.
Not gonna lie, I actually had to look that one up.  At least if you were using [dwm](http://dwm.suckless.org/) you could claim it's because you're better than everyone else (go to [their website](http://dwm.suckless.org/) and do a search for "elitist").
I like oldies :(  CBS FM
The Catholic Church doesn't "support" a metaphorical interpretation of Genesis; it does allow members to make their own judgement as to whether Genesis 1 is a literal, 6-day telling of the story of creation, or whether it tells a story of what really happened using symbolic language. In other words, the Church has no official position on Young Earth Creationism vs. Old Earth Creationism / Theistic Evolution.  However, the Catholic Church has made it a matter of official Church teaching that Adam and Eve were two, real, unique human beings, and that every human is descended from them. Otherwise, the doctrine of original sin would make no sense. (Pope Pius XII, Humanii Generis)
Toyota/Scion tech. As far as shit broken, Sienna and Highlander. Its not that they are shit its they take the most abuse. Water pumps, Radiators, (t-belts!), Frozen caliper slides, P/s racks.  For maintenance the Tundra, 4runner and Tacoma. Diff services, and T-belts make me lots of money. Front calipers on 4 piston calipers also like to lock up a lot. Also Air pumps.   The cars have Evap problems too, and water pumps also (The new pink coolant seems to leak out of any orifice possible), but other wise are pretty solid. Some cars have VVT cam gear problems but belive me they are no money makers.
When someone sees me coming up behind them at a restaurant or store, and just lets the door shut in my face. I was raised to hold the door open. My dad taught me that if someone is within 10 steps of the door, go ahead and hold it for them. If it's iffy, hold it anyway. Always be that guy, because if someone's having a bad day, a stranger showing the smallest consideration can be the thing that turns the day back around for them. And if *you're* having a bad day, knowing that you did something to make a stranger's day .001% better could have the same effect.  When someone sees me and just lets the door shut, and I have to catch it to avoid getting hit by it, I don't know.. it feels akin to being spat on. Kind of like, "I know you're there, but fuck you."  It's probably irrational, but it really gets to me.
There's probably some excellent YouTube videos on the subject.  Basically; It's dry and porous. Water wants to be there. Think of it like a bunch of tiny sponges.   Once water starts collecting in the rice, more water will be attracted to it until it hits an equilibrium. I'd probably change the rice out every few days though to speed things along.
70% of the U.S. are not "extremely overworked or mentally troubled individual". Nor can 70% of the population claim that "they may slowly feel their lives slipping out of control and feel a deep helplessness" as an excuse for their poor diet.  Additionally, overworked is not an excuse for being fat. I've worked 60+ hours for the vast majority of the last 17 years.
As someone with many European friends, this isn't anything uncommon.
Heck no.  Nothing wrong with a toned body.
I hoped to verify this, but my googling had failed to turn up any news story to corroborate this. The only thing I found was this: http://www.toledo.com/index.php?src=events&amp;srctype=detail&amp;refno=608451&amp;category=Comedy  Frankly, he is not helped by the link in this submission, which looks at best amateurish, and offers nothing in the way of credible corroboration. It seems harsh to ask corroboration from someone who has just gone through a series of personal tragedies, but it would make it easier for people to help him out.
The point at which it has its own unique DNA, unlike anything else. Unless there are twins, but that's not the point. There are a lot of cases where people are sick or ill and have less or no sentience; do we stop considering them humans and start medically killing people by the thousands?  edit: more. And for that matter, does a baby suddenly have sentience AFTER it is outside the womb by .01 seconds? where is the line? I'm pretty sure I didn't know I was alive when I was 3 days old. I sure don't remember it. Why is there a difference inside vs outside the body?
I thought it was supposed to be a pun... marijuana...drug...
That seemed like it should've kept going, because it ended rather oddly. Your story needs more to it, simply. It can be summarized as "Musician annoys Blog-Owner; Blog-Owner's Brother says 'Don't add her as a friend' " Which is far to short, even for a "short" story. If you could develop this a lot more I'd definitely read it. As of now I'd say I don't much care for it, but if you could keep going, advance the characters and such, I'd like it. You need a problem in the story and as of now you simply don't, arguably, and the problem that is there if it is (Main Character wanting Beu's sister) is **totally** unresolved.
They shopped shipping them individually now. That's great. I remember opening just as many and having much larger boxes because they still had the retail boxes on them. Or maybe your ordered them special? I was stocking a school reseller, but we still had huge orders for departments and they just came in retail boxes.
Approaching someone you don't know and have never talked to, especially a girl... it's so obvious. It's a transparent move.
Hrmm. Maybe it is best to bin it and start over now, trying to get the bonuses. I could do this run in half the time, with what I know. My main concern would be, like I said, my own incompetence, and getting party wipes on attempting the bonus missions. Might be worth making some friends to help me out.
TIL North Korea competes in the Olympics.
Right.  Cause everyone can snipe with shotties from a half mile away...
Thanks, and you are SOOOOOO right! 
&gt; It is what gives people hope in times of hardships  Other people serve that purpose, too.  And yes, I think religion ruins things, society included.  The downvote's because you're an idiot.
England, and we watched Crimson Tide, cheers! Haven't seen it for a while.
It's generally a person Whom I like/respect (I can't really bring myself to screw someone I don't.) but have absolutely nothing in common with. If we were to go on dates with just the two of us, there would probably be very little that we would both want to do/talk about. HOWEVER It's entirely common to discover over the course of a FWB situation that we hadn't evaluated the situation correctly, and that we should indeed give a real relationship a shot.  The other time it happens is with ex-girlfriends, but let's not get into that.
My cereal protip which I picked up recently after two decades of experience in cereal pouring: pull the bag out a little bit so that when you pour the cereal out, you won't get any bits falling into the box. It's a habit that takes a while to get used to. I sometimes forget...
[Gaaaaaayyyy](http://i.imgur.com/Vbqhg.jpg)
Answer the phone with, "[city name] Abortion Clinic, this is Dr. Mengele speaking, how may I help you?"
Ooh la la! I have never seen the C.G. Glow. I'm curious, how do you like it? Btw, I really like how you organized your polishes.
That was such a good episode. 
People kept asking him in the chat of a live stream he was part of. It snowballed from there.
Don't select an engineering field based on what commands the best salary.   All of them will be lucrative for somebody who is good in his field, and the way to be good in your field is to select a field that you find interesting.  The US engineering market is fine. Look nationwide for jobs and see what you find.
Is that a Hunter S. Thompson reference nestled in there?
I thought 300 wins was enough. It really wasnt. Try to get to 500 wins at the very least. Get a support rune page as well, and learn to support with gp10 runes/quints/masteries and gp10 items.
SNOW VALLEY!! I know that map like the back of my hand.
You should talk to this guy http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/xgm6b/i_never_talk_to_people_on_their_21st_birthday/
Ha tres y media años de español en escuela  e due anni d'italiano in l'università.  But English is my first language.
I think you are not familiar with some of the concepts being used, but i'll try a swift explanation the best I can:  - You can alter your -own- cart and change the merchantid and md5hash to match your account, then when you click Pay you will start a payment to your DIBS account (However, your dibs merchant name will be clearly stated, and most firms have customized their DIBS payment pages anyway so this is pretty glaring)  That being said, for this to work you need a way to manipulate -other- users cart accounts. This can be accomplished by: Man in the middle attack if the original merchant does not use SSL or XSS injection vulnerability on the same page as the checkout is happening on.  As for the extension, it sounds like you are writing a malicious piece of software (let me know otherwise) so I won't elaborate further.
No, please stop this circlejerk! 
[COCK] so high....
As far as heating goes, I believe he was simply heating it up in a normal pan. Pretty ghetto and not safe, I know. He keeps mentioning that for his next batch he is going to use a wok.  For casting he uses pvc. Basically he lines the inside of the pvc with paper, then pours the mixture into that. Of course he also has a dowel in there for the bore hole.  As far as KNO3 going bad I found this [forum](http://www.chemicalforums.com/index.php?topic=48853.0). I guess it depends on humidity. If the mixture is clumpy then I would dispose of it or do a quick test to see if it is good.  And, to be even less helpful (haha), I have no idea what his mix ratio was. There seems to be tons of info. online though. Just do some serious research and testing.
It's exactly what you think it is. Two guys take a hammer to the face of a third.
Seemed like the dude was more affected as he stopped living his life to demand explanations for why he was categorized by strangers.
great addition to the conversation.
that's such a sad picture :X
I just tried playing that. It is kind of dark in the room that I am currently in, and I get scared easily. I just had collected one piece of paper, then I heard the thunderous footsteps.... After about 10 seconds, I quit. I was way too scared.
tjohns113 &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Season 5 is the last season of Breaking Bad.
Having said that, the Khajiit totally joined the Thalmor, and that ain't cool.
I read the Anarchist's cookbook years ago, adding me to that list would be redundant. 
Man, get a body pillow (bolster pillow). Best cuddle partners ever. Other than your SO, obviously. I also have a gromit soft toy who has arms and legs, he kind of hugs back...
My mom did this sort of shit too. She'd confront me over stuff she'd read in my diary. She eavesdropped on all my calls and then asked me to explain things that I'd talked about. She always insisted on doing my laundry, and I found out why the day that she yelled at me for having semen-stained underpants. We don't talk much anymore.
i definitely loved lance bass when i was 15.  i think he's in his 30s so that's ok for me (i'm 29).  however hes gay so im pretty sure he would turn me down if i went for it!
Yup, I was really crossing my fingers when I saw it that they'd have them all individually on sale like during the summer sale. Unfortunately, it seems they were more clever than I originally thought.
I said "Might be". I didn't want to get arrested by the NSFW police.
So you want to gain .95lbs of fat every day? Interesting strategy.
the gunslinger concept really meshed with me, but I actually just wish there was a revolver in dayz. I bet it would suck, but I'd use the hell out of one.
I actually think that this is a very interesting topic. Just a quick note, but re: Global Warming, I seem to recall someone (Bob?) mentioning in Summer Knight that it was caused by the growing influence of the Summer Court (hence Aurora's brashness), rather than the other way around.  Something else that I'd like to see would be a kind of metaphysics for the Dresdenverse, kind of like what you're putting out here. Could it be that the Fae and Dragons (and possibly even God) are more than just forces of nature, but that they're anthropomorphized because they were created by the belief of humanity? It would match up well with the Fae "sealing their power" from the actions of the Brothers Grimm, and the existence of the Oblivion War. I think it would be very interesting, especially during the Apocalyptic Trilogy, if JB were to look into the real power that vanilla mortals could have over these beings if they really are their creators.  Just my $0.02.
Okay here's my first attempt.  Might redo it with better quality if we enough people to do this right http://youtu.be/Lgfu9ekdPQ4
I say no to watching this but Reddit keeps dragging me back in......I can't go a day without watching this.... :'(
Oh, yeah, I understand that. Just throwing in my two cents on the non-randomness.
That's a statement I can get behind. The proof lies on those making the claim, but the unknown is always subject to having any answer until we know otherwise.  Edit: more words and punctuation 
I thought the Baller Stout was pretty good.  I was in the same boat as you where I got into the release really late.  Vanilla Bean DL is the one with the red wax in the center.  I really liked the Beer Geek Brunch Weasel.  It had the strongest coffee flavor of any stout I've ever tried. 
It's mostly an American thing for women to shave. 
I'LL HAVE YOU KNOW STEVE YOUNG AND CONDOLEEZA RICE WERE THE GREATEST QB-WR DUO IN HISTORY
I agree. It surprised me. They rarely, if ever, (aside from bleach) only buy the rights to one airing of a season.  (My god if they bought multiple airings of Casshern though.)
I agree with all of this.  My question is, what came first, the amendments against gay marriage, or the push for it.  I only became aware of it as an issue when constitutional amendments against it were being passed, and a federal amendment was proposed.  However it does seem to go against logic to pass something if there is no push for it, this is the US political system we're talking about...
Stupid novelty account.  Look at the username.
http://i.imgur.com/YA2LU.jpg
I hate to say it but your attitude towards being groped just enables the offenders.  We must demand to grope the tittays in return, it is only fair.
Ditto. I've come as far as understanding how to check how much karma I have and how it gets there.. I'm just not sure why I want/need more of it?
I made another one of the same scene that I was gonna submit later, but I'd love to make more when I'm back in town. For now, [I leave you with this.](http://i.minus.com/iby8f8WJO4Wiga.gif)
In the Dove campaign, all the women have hourglass figures, there is no cellulite, no folds, no rolls.  It's any better than the VS ad IMO.
Toledo here, I'm in
How much did you smoke per day?
holy crap, the sheer fact that you can do this is enough for me to get the game. That's amazing.
Helped by zax! all is good.
This isn't really the Diamond problem.  You've overridden the input method in the `StudentWorker` class so there's no ambiguity about which method to call from a parent class.   You've explicitly told it to call each parent's input method, which in turn call their parent's input method, which happens to be the same.
gentlified
We just had our first outing!  It was to my university/place of employ... a quiet floor full of accounting professors trying to get work done.  I was so afraid she was going to cry and be a disturbance, but she was awesome!  Good luck getting in shape!  I've got 25 pounds to go, and I've been using the dreadful Florida weather as an excuse to stay indoors...
Edit: Back! I said I'd finish this post after dinner, so to prove I am no liar, and to make those of you unable to eat freely jealous, [here](http://imgur.com/N5oj9) is my finished dinner and [here](http://imgur.com/zAEbC) is dessert. Delicious, delicious dessert. Notice how the light of the unset sun glistens off the pecan's glaze...  So where was i?  This is part of the sacred trusts in the sultans palace, or Topkapı Palace, in Istanbul. I've seen this myself. It's mostly bullshit. Allow me to explain.  This is a collection of Mohamed's personal effects, or sacred trusts, that the Turks looted from the Arab world after they assumed the Caliphate. In this part of the palace are gutters from the Kaba, locks from the Kaba, cloth from the Kaba, etc etc. I recall that room VIVIDLY. Slight racist moment, but you could smell that room before you saw it. There were so many arabs/muslims elbowing each other to get into that hot, hot, room that it was basically a B.O. incubator. There are armed police, with machine guns in each room keeping the mob of devotees in line and pushing them along. I say "line" but there is no line, just a mass of worshipers praying and shoving each other to get closer to the glass and see these pieces of their prophet, in the same manner catholics do, but with that irony that only comes from seeing people who will stone you if you draw the prophet because you might worship the picture, groveling and touching the relics of that same prophet.  Below is a list of the artifacts I remember seeing:  * The [Sword of David](http://imgur.com/AtcBU): A surprisingly hard piece of steel for a small impoverished nation state just [coming off the bronze age](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Archaeology_of_Israel#Bronze_Age).  * The [Staff of Moses](http://imgur.com/0kN8T) (please hold laughter until the end): Well boys and girls, this is it, the staff of moses. Obviously the real thing because it's behind glass! This thing looked to be about 3ft tall. * Mohamed's Beard: Yup that's right! The beard of the prophet was collected after he shaved it off and distributed it after a pilgrimage, and we all know how much science agrees with the quran, so I'm sure the muslims had it tested.... oh, nevermind. * [Mohamed's Tooth](http://www.thesacredtrusts.com/): * Mohamed's cup: The cup is wooden, but someone covered it in silk, so all you could see was the lip of the cup. I learned after the tip the REAL cup is in London. I saw a replica. * Mohamed's sword, bow, and quiver: They were pretty. As I stood there looking at them all I could think was "so that's the pen that mohamed drew the boundaries of his empire with." * Mohamed's Mantle: Who knows if this is real or not, but there is a lot of silly... WORSHIP of mohamed that can be observed through this. The Ottomans used to kiss it on the 15th day of Ramadan. They even once dipped one button into water and gave drops of that water to favorites, and they all CURE PEOPLE! Magic! This was also CARRIED INTO BATTLE to inspire the sultan's troops to fight harder to spread islam! So peaceful, mashallah.  * Abu Bakr's Sword: Maybe? The Ottomans "decorated" all these swords in gold and jewels so GL to who ever has to verify thier age when the muslims let them get tested for authenticity.  * Omar's sword: eh. * Ali's sword: THIS I DOUBT. This was NOT Zulfiqar, as it was not split at the end. yeah I know some say it wasn't, but ex-Shia here so I heard dif stuff than you. * [Fatima's Dress](http://imgur.com/aVPfI): okay, i kinda doubt it. * Hussein's "mantle"/dress: lol.  I also leaened the Ottoman's rebuilt the Kaba! [After a heavy rain and flood in 1621 and further in 1629 the walls of Kaaba fell down and the Masjid was damaged.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Masjid_al-Haram#Ottomans) That's right the HOUSE OF ALLAH, built by adam (who didnt share his building techniques with the cavemen...) and Abraham, **fell down**. I can't resist: ["The truth has now come, and falsehood has withered away: for, behold, all falsehood is bound to wither away!"](http://www.islamicity.com/quransearch/default.asp?ref=17:81)
Zetsu clone with use of Izuna's body? idk for some reason I think Izuna is involved, especially after Kishis latest interview.
That card is ass now
KILL IT WITH FIRE
You're welcome.
With Zuck running things I'd say 3 years profit ~~ under $2 a share.
alanalan426
I love you for this comment. I had a serious appreciation before, but now you have all my love!
They didn't air it just in case Best Korea did win.  That is the level of hatred your capitalist empire has for TRUE Korea.
Hey didn't they start the construction of the Grand Entrance of the Moynihan Station
Well, he can rest assured in that many short women dislike tall men on the basis of how we always seem to treat them like teddy bears. 
I've been seeing posts of swimmers on my feed all day......from Men and Women......equal opportunity voyeurism 
Also it's a dumb ass joke
Come on... his money is in a [blind trust](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aGxbF2ksr5Y&amp;feature=player_embedded), he has no idea what they do with his millions of dollars.
She doesn't have to be a virgin to do "the virgin". I'm pretty sure she knows she's no longer a virgin if she's had a baby.  This kind of shit is the cancer killing reddit.
The Grab shoudnt be a skillshot :D
So green. Thanks for sharing!
I have a feeling Teemo's going to get blinded this time
It's not all about how things look. Even though that's what Apple claims.
The next act will be to ensure no talking between genders and a safety zone of fifty feet must be ensured at all times.
this gif is relevant to the title of the thread.
Looks like the "better sorting" or skyrim UI mod.
What is it like going camping with your girlfriend?  Fucking intense!
I'm a Christian and I agree 100%. 
http://www.reddit.com/r/PoliticalHumor/comments/xfc28/a_brit_a_jew_and_a_pole/c5m3ibe
He's one of the old guard of Milan. Those kids don't show enough respect and should get off his lawn!
All the colors match!
I'm watching the Phills-Nats game and it sounds like they LOVED Victorino.  And LA beats Philly hands down, so there's that.
Is it typical to have a class that says you need a book online but you dont actually use? I dont want to invest in a book and not use it. 
Since the split into 8 divisions, the NFC West has the worst record of any division .
I can buy some, I've got $27.50 in paypal cash to spend. Can you add me via flair whenever it's convenient. 
Modern? You must have been pretty young in the early 90's. 
http://albany.craigslist.org/search/apa?query=&amp;srchType=A&amp;minAsk=&amp;maxAsk=1400&amp;bedrooms=4  Just remember, legal apartments in Albany cannot rent to more than three people who are unrelated. If you're in that boat and the landlord doesn't care, you might want to be extra cautious about the other laws they are willing to ignore. As long as he asks and you tell him someone is a cousin or something, you're fine.
I was talking about the desktop, not the menu bar, though I see where you're going with that.
$5 for a meal that is bounds more filling and nutritious than the other fast food chains is a ok in my book!
Like three dude!
Nah, see, here's the difference between   &gt;gays tend to vote like women -- with their emotions, rather than with logic.  and  &gt;bears shit in the woods.  Bear shit actually exists in reality.  Your strange generalizations about homosexual people and women do not.
He literally just posted this. Why wouldn't he get a chance to post his own original content. This is just karma whoring. 
I wanna do this! I live in Oregon too!
well cops do have that one show..... you know, that show Cops?
Stomp'em in the nuts, I'mma stomp'em in the nuts. 
I wish more people would read the actual description of the initiative instead of freaking out and jumping to conclusions.  
Just wanted to say that I'm sorry about the double post. I don't know how that happened. grrr reddit....
308 Remington 700 for deer / elk hunting  223 for coyote/hog hunting  22LR for plinking and keeping marksman skills sharp   12ga Remington 870 pump gun for bird hunting  50cal Barrett M82 because I think it's fun
I think the monitor has gotten cracked internally. I will be going to the local computer shop this weekend and see what was truly the cause of this. 
The point is that if you have declining economic growth, then you will collect less tax revenue, you will obviously have a higher debt/GDP ratio, this will cause deficit hawks to call for even more cuts in spending, causing even lower GDP.  So while he thinks that "a Libertarian approach to our current problems will balance the budget." it may in fact do the opposite.
I think that you should maybe try some weird stuff, try to change the way champions are played, and maybe even try unortodox champion at, e.g., top lane.  Being chill and make fun of things while taking the game seriously is a good way to go. But don't get me wrong, I'm not saying you don't do such things. I don't remember ever watching your stream, but i'm looking forward to it now =)
Good thing you're so excited  [](/bendover)Bend over
I don't know a lot about American law, but that sure sounds like defamation to me.  And even if it's not, that is conduct most unbecoming of a judge.
This needs to be a new meme face... somehow
Depends on the job but if involves non-complicated tasks then by all means blaze before work.
Which is better for shipping to Canada? I'm worried about ordering parts because of shipping and duty charges.
Your opinion, respected.
Good job! Dunno why you were downvoted...
It must be nice to always have a place to live.
The stand alone is apparently called War-Z, and I believe they're releasing it November.  ~~War-Z website~~  EDIT: Sorry, I've been missinformed about this game (I admit to not reading the website). My mistake. War-z is something different, and Day-z does plan to become a stand alone game.
Press it? You still press your albums?
People always say things like this to justify lower league players criticisms of pro-level players, incontrol said it himself about casters who are masters or worse criticizing players, it's incredibly easy to discuss players mistakes from the perspective of seeing everything: "Why doesn't he build a robo doesn't he know cloak banshees could come out this time?"   "Why on earth did he lose his army what a stupid decision, doesn't he know he's supposed to keep his army *alive*?"   SC2 is a game of probabilities and incomplete information as much as poker is, even the best players in the world don't win a dominating % of their games. Until you intimately understand the probabilities and decisions going through a players head as well as the various timings for each race, you really can't criticize the knowledge or decision making of someone far better than you..
All of the described actions are considered sexual harassment at my workplace, sooo I don't know if you have the right to harass people in France....
May he rip phonebooks in half?
Another thing:  You have to wear a karcharah (boxers). When you have a shower/bath you must make sure you have a new pair right next to you. Take half of it off and put the new one on. Incase you were called to battle, you would be ready. 
Ok...you make a good point. Making music free has opened the flood gates to your musical landscape. However, royalties from music purchases are not simply divided up between the good guy (artist) and the cigar smoking bad guy (label). There's a manager, who works his ass off for half as much as he used to, along with a producer, an audio engineer, other studio musicians (based upon the deal cut), etc. Blue collar people. I agree that majors are ridiculous...but there are other people working to get the music in your hands and ears.
Clinton was able to compromise heavily with the other side and was even able to play uncooperative dems against uncooperative republicans to get the legislation he wanted past. Reagan on the other hand was an utterly incompetent president who happened to inherit a lot of economic geniuses from the Carter administration (look up Paul Volcker). Kennedy is so far back that the way he ran his administration doesn't translate to anything Obama could do (plus half of the things Kennedy did would be impeachment level transgressions today).   Obama's major downfall in the first two years of his presidency was that he tried to talk to much with the other side and wasn't prepared for the unexpected end of his super-majority in the senate (ted kennedy's death) so I don't see how taking into account varied opinions could have helped anymore than it has already hurt him. I'm sorry if I sound pissed but I feel for Obama, it's hard to get things done when half of the people you're supposed to be working with have getting you out of office as their main priority. Also, out of curiosity what smart people are you referring to that Romney has access to and Obama doesn't. 
The fact that I had admmited that I have given bjs before, and whenever we watched the big bang theory (I know, we party hard) I would "joke" about teaming up on sheldon.  So yeah, not a huge surprise.
Girl from Ipanema?
Alf.
My doctor requires one every year before she'll refill my birth control prescription. That might just be that health care system's policy though.
I don't know anything about Bank of KoL or KoL Capital, but I will be listening to this with great interest, having loosely followed the saga of Bank of KoL.  Also, Radio KoL can sometimes be accessed in-browser [here](http://www.shoutcast.com/Internet-Radio/radio%20KoL) (If it's 64k or 24k at the end of the stream name it's probably us).
No.
My name is Rick 
Recipe: Cinnamon Sugar Bananas   **Ingredients:** Cinnamon, Sugar, Banana   **Instructions:** Combine Cinnamon and sugar to taste. Peel and slice banana as desired. About 1/4in (.75cm) slices work the best. Coat with cinnamon/sugar mixture. Consume.   You're motherfucking welcome. 
'MERICA
TIL That stating a fact is misogyny and clearly part of the menz agenda to take over the world.
I wear mine basically every day too!! Now I have a weird sperry tan on my upper foot :)
Last time I used Max to control stuff in Logic, I needed to do a bit of Environment to get it working how I wanted.
The Falcons finished 7-7 that year. It was before my time, but it is the same old Atlanta sports team. 
I'm no lawyer, but I think in the US the standard for slander is pretty high. You have to prove malicious intent, I think, which is difficult. Thus successful slander and libel suits are relatively rare compared to England, where the bar is set lower: you only have to prove damage.
Depends on whether you're in red, amber, or green cycle. My guys get out to the field about 1 or 2 times a month right now (red cycle).
factor 360: 2 2 2 3 3 5  So 360 is divisible into whole numbers by  2 4 5 6 8 10 12 15 20 30 and 60  This is very useful for doing math without calculators or fractions.
This, exactly.  The best thing about Boomerang Blade is that it can hit twice.  Make a change like this, and you take that away almost entirely.. unless your enemies are stupid and run into both paths...
like a normal person, by learning to play the bagpipes 
yeah hopefully i dont see any girls at lans cuz i live for sausagefests
what a weird Argentina/France dating couple
hats off to this man
I'm working on it...
I can hear Waldo laughing from my childhood. 
 That's craptastic, since the standard cost for incarcerating a prisoner in the US is around 30K per year. At the same time people that have scammed and defrauded people for millions haven't even gone to court...
nice beretta
thanks for adding!
I like this.  I like you.
Mine were probably just really dry, I should give 'em another try
Thanks, should have thought of this. Ill try it after and report back later tonight.
Sorry, already got it.  Anything else?
;)  True
the sharp end by sender films
Didn't realize Frank West was a furry.
Best part is that is only one novel. You have four more to abuse yourself with.
We were all kids, late teens, early 20's. So we would see everyone rather often. The thief's nerves were real frayed after a few fights tthat would literally just come from  nowhere, no warning. It was awesome!
Dual booting windows and wait for the next sale. 
I disagree. I feel way more open and looser after doing it. I used to have a lot of nagging pains that I just don't seem to get anymore. And I am way, way more flexible.  That said, I still despise the yoga x workout. 
Statler and Waldorf.  And Peirce.
If nothing else works, turn off your PSU at the back. That's the most assured way to get it off short of unplugging it.
That's why I said "the closest"
No apology necessary, DictirQistin, have a good day/evening.
The Titanium Tiger Woods
I remember when I played the clarinet in elementary school.  It was fun when I got out of a class twice a week.  Then they moved band to an hour before school started and I quit the next day.  I wasn't waking up early and walking to school vs getting a ride for that crap.
Hey dude, go be a pretentious ass hat elsewhere.  Thank you!
I'm confused. Do you want to learn kanji or do you want to learn radicals? They're not always the same thing.  When you say "learn kanji via radicals," the first thing that comes to mind for me is learning kanji grouped by radicals -- i.e., you'd learn 橋 松 校 椅, etc. all because they have the mokuhen (木)... which isn't necessarily a good way to learn kanji.
Another complementary rule.  If he/she complains about everyone - they will complain about you eventually.
Leo, I'd like to start by saying that you're a fantastic person and I love watching your shows. I've been watching you for over 10 years now and you are wonderful. Thank you.   Will we see a TechTV reunion anytime soon? That is, are there any plans for a spoof episode of The Screen Savers if you can round up the old gang? The nostalgia would be great!   Keep making shows, Leo! 
Okay, thank you for your response =] Glad I learned something.
I just realized there's no downvote button in /r/Pyongyang  Not very [Gangnam Style](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/newsfeed/000/363/835/32a.gif), if you ask me
It's 1:1. They hand them out at freshman orientation after you enroll. 
Billy D Williams MCed a jazz bass competition that i went to a few years ago. He appeared drunk or hung over.
Would I need to do sli if I had  gtx 670? And what would I overclock if I wanted to 
You're his cat, you would know.
[Sancocho](http://imgur.com/mtjhI)  You can use any kind of meat in this stew. Chicken, ribs, beef chucks, even fish. I like mine with oxtail so I'll go with that.  If you're going to cook oxtail, you need a pressure cooker since it's really tough to cook. Add enough water to cover the meat and cook it until tender (if you need more info on this, let me know and I'll get the specifics).  Once the meat is tender, add carrots, corn, potatoes, cassava/yuca, plantains, salt, pepper, cilantro and any other starch you want. I don't usually add sweet potato since this tends to be more of a savory dish instead of a sweet one, but whatever works. Cook in the pot until the veggies are done and serve with lime and avocado. If you want to get especially Colombian, serve with a banana. I know it sounds weird but it's actually really tasty.  Also, you can either add the cilantro while it cooks or sprinkle some on after you serve it.   I'm sorry it took so long ahaha. It's been a crazy month for me.
La seule exception que je connais est «courriel» - en anglais, ça veut dire "email". Les autres... même chose dans les deux.  (C'est possible que je fasse des erreurs, le français c'est ma troisième langue...)
Taeja touches the fire and it freezes him
I'm fortunate enough to live in the greater Boston area, I can drive an hour and go pick a peck of apples out at the orchard.  All I need to do is find somebody who owns an apple press up here.  Last fall I bought unpasteurized cider at $3/gallon from this mom and pop place somewhere randomly in the middle of nowhere.  I've let most of mine age, and after 6-8 months, it's really fantastic.
Borderlands.
Funny, I've had my iMac going on 5 years with nary a hiccup, despite multiple moves  and even getting knocked on the floor. My Macbook is almost 3 years old and the only issue I've had was when my dog chewed through the power cable. Despite the damage, Apple replaced the entire power adapter free of charge. 
I wouldn't go that far, but compared to the third it was great.  Mainly due to the gaping plotholes of the third.
I personally would never recommend a used (or honestly even a new) Audi.  Their reliability/quality is just not there. Some people seem to have no issues with the, while others have problem after problem after problem.  No way - wouldn't touch the brand with a ten foot pole. 
You can see the colon after his name, indicating it is something he said...
from whats happening in my pants i would say i like it alot
Psst, Hero of Time... I think that's Ganondorf making a call behind you.
Richfield just north of Menomonee Falls exit 164  has the biggest one I know about. Decent young to middle aged male and female leagues.
I agree with the supporting local musicians idea. There is such a huge amount of bands now and an equally large market for them to use but you have to have support around you before you go off to other places. If more people listened to their local bands they could find some great music, I live in the middle of shitty South Dakota and I know some pretty kick ass bands that play for pennies pretty much.
APK is on google code. http://code.google.com/p/azilink/downloads/list
Nektar shirt?  I knew he was buddies with Jon Anderson.  Very cool find.
(Florida isn't really that hot.)
What on earth is that last tank on the bottom right?  Looks like it has a 35cm gun or something.
He was kind of a dick in the way he brought it up, but I think he has a point. I came here just wanting to see what it was, and it took me awhile to find any comment about what and where this picture was from. I was about to just say, "fuck it" until I found your link to the menu.
Man, isn't it? For me, it was pretty much the catalyst for quitting. Welcome to /r/leaves buddy, I'm pretty sure everyone has your back here.
If you're out of market (like I am) I recommend an MLB.tv subscription and splitting it with a friend or two... It honestly is pretty cheap when you split it up over a couple of people.  Your free options are going to be vastly inferior, of course.  Just my two cents.
Interested in **Orcs Must Die GOTY Edition**? 
I ctrl + f'd "nope" and am proceeding to downvote almost every comment including it in this thread, so I have to agree.
[Spirit Island](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spirit_Island), in Jasper National Park, Alberta
TIL She's the reverse hulk.
[insert Leeroy Jenkins reference here]
This happened on my first date with my Fiance (then stranger! lol). We were having dinner in a food court and his ex came and tapped him on the shoulder. Awkward! 
You should have stood next to or behind a potted plant of some sort.
Someone who knows about these! I was there for marine biology and it was frustrating not knowing exactly what all the terrestrial stuff was. Did I get the ID right on this one?  http://imgur.com/a/eEyDX#17
hey Mayberry, Shane would've caught that one...
Th is reminds me of the College Humor video on self defense.  "First, you're going to want wrist control.... and then you pull out your gun.."
Man god likes some fucked up music, if this really was his plan.
Not creepy, just ugly. doesn't mean he fucks kids!
According to a recent Bloomberg poll  55% believed Romney to be more out of touch with average Americans.  Perception is reality.  http://www.bloomberg.com/news/2012-06-20/obama-leads-in-poll-as-voters-view-romney-as-out-of-touch.html
I CAN'T FUCKING WAIT
All testing supplies are free via mail order for us.
That may be true, yet the problems caused by this fact remain apparent.  We've had this experiment at market based capitalism go on for well over 100 years now, and we know for a fact that imbalances build up, bubbles if you will.  These need to be corrected, because the larger they grow, the bigger they pop.  It's easy to think that there is nothing wrong with the status quo given our own short myopic time horizons, but the history of the great depression (and the depression of the 1890's before that) tells us these things happen with regularity.
And Metroid: Other M
[](/rdsmile) Oh, I know.  It's my special gift.
you can make an anonymous facebook account, its just that that defeats the point of having a facebook account. Just like you could go on 4chan and post your address, pictures of yourself, etc.
So are you seriously going to just take her request and not do anything? You can't just leave us hanging op. She's definitely just going to bang that guy.
I believe that it is a life-changing, eye-opening way to see the real world. As an 18 year old male who has to somehow adapt into this monstrosity of a world, I find it incredibly hard to bear. Reading news reports of how men were put to jail simply because the woman's word was trusted (there was no proof) and how men would have been fined insane amounts. Luckily a few of these men had proof (audio and video recordings, like the taxi driver who told the three teenage girls in his cab to not smoke) but the evidence was cast aside as "not enough" to do anything against the women.  This has led me to constantly think of breaking up with my girlfriend (planning on getting married after we finish university) and I am sometimes unable to sleep at night due to the insane double standards. Not only this, but people laugh at men's genitals getting harmed in movies or other cases, but if 1% of the equal was even mentioned against a woman, the shock would be unbearable for the audience.  To be completely honest, I have considered suicide around 12 times now, attempting twice. It is very tough to know that one day when I have little children of my own, who I provide for, feed, love, raise, and nurture, will be taken away from me in the blink of an eye because one woman decided that she suddenly did not want me anymore. It is heart-wrenching, disgusting, and very degrading.  MensRights is truly a necessary medium for public records against men in daily life to be kept.  Thank you for reading, I hope your opinion matches mine.
Mine was marked at $39, got it for basically $32 since I was buying something else at the time and got a discount on the pair.
They did but it was in a mutant training simulator for about 3 minutes in the movie. Whack. 
[The B-52's's Planet Claire](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1EPP3gkh_00) That music video belies the badassness I feel when I'm hearing this in my head, but still.
Yeah that is a good example of it. Of course I watched the new series before the classic series and I even watched the new series out of order so big arc reveals meant nothing to me. My history is quite scrambled.  It means more to classic fans because you've got more lore to draw from.
I'm glad you cited statistics.  Please take a look at my other comment that links to databases and studies on this topic.
Noted. Some good stuff in there. 
[Obligatory](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Gpc5_3B5xdk)
Study up. The word "author" is not next to the word "authority" for no reason.
I love buying music.  Nothing tops owning a physical copy of your media.  I can't say this applies for everyone, but if all albums were $4 a piece I would buy all of my music.
Actually don't bother, I came.
yes. 
You can do it through tags. I check my buzz page every so often and a lot of hits come from those (particularly "doomjazz" for some reason). 
I brewed a barleywine back in December that should be coming into its own about now. http://hopville.com/recipe/1059037/english-barleywine-recipes/edge-of-madness
Yeah, but the first mentioning is something that often gets overlooked. Definitely magic/power of some kind.  However this guy is right. The scrael are attracted to the piece kvothe keeps. Also the fire that burned the first scrael's body went out long before kvothe snuck out to fight the remaining creatures. 
I am/ was in a very similar situation. I have one little sister and she was the one that had bad grades, she was rude and lazy and yet both my parents love her a lot more than they love me. I credit doing so well in school and sports to them because I was always trying to get my dad's attention I was motivated. When I told people that my parents love my sister more than I do they accuse me of being unfair. It seems so engrained in us that our parents must love all their kids equally but its not true.  tl;dr I know how you feel. It sucks.
I don't know what people's love affair with Visa Service's are.  The best and easiest way to get a Visa processed is direct through the consulate. I understand that people fret because they don't want to miss any of the finer details and miss out, but it's not rocket science.  My best tip for preparing a Visa application is to look at what the country (China, in this case) tells other countries for the same visa.  The reason I do this is because sometimes things do get lost in translation and formatting.  The way something is explained to a US Citizen, a Canadian Citizen, or a New Zealand Citizen might be different, but all mean the same thing.  Two you might go "well that makes no sense..." and one you go "ah yes, I know what that means!". Comparing [this](http://www.china-embassy.org/eng/hzqz/zgqz/t84245.htm) for the USA and [this](http://au.china-embassy.org/eng/ls/t286322.htm) for Aussies for the exact same information is a good reflection of the same. For example [if you're an Australian trying to get a Z Visa](http://au.china-embassy.org/eng/ls/t286322.htm)  &gt; **2. How do I apply for a Business Visa (F Visa) if I need to visit China on business?**  &gt; You should provide the following documents:   &gt; * (1) One completed Visa Application Form with a passport photograph attached;   &gt; * (2) Your passport with at least 6-month validity and at least 2 blank visa pages;   &gt; * (3) One of the following documents (original or photocopy):   &gt; * - a. Invitation letter from the competent office of the Chinese government.   &gt; * - b. Invitation letter from the host company in China.   &gt; Please note:   &gt; (1) Apply for the visa only 1 to 2months before your planned date to enter China.   &gt; (2) People born in China must provide their names in Chinese characters to column "1" of the Visa Application Form.   &gt; (3) Fill in every column of the Visa Application Form, using "N/A" if not applicable.   &gt; (4) The supporting documents will not be returned once lodged with the application. If necessary, please make copy beforehand.   &gt; (5) The "PICK UP FORM" you get when you lodge the application is the only proof for collection; when lost, only the passport holder himself with proper photo ID can retrieve his passport.   &gt; (6) Please be aware that no modification will be accepted once the application is lodged.   &gt; (7) Please pay for the visa on collection (Please refer to Question 11, 12 for the visa fee), and please pay in cash, bank cheque, money order or company cheque. The "payee" should be CHINESE EMBASSY.   &gt; **3. How do I apply for an Employment Visa (Z Visa) if I am going to get employment in China?**  &gt; You should provide the following documents:   &gt; * (1) One completed Visa Application Form with a passport photograph attached;   &gt; * (2) Your passport with at least 6-month validity and at least 2 blank visa pages;   &gt; * (3) Employment Permit (the original one and a photocopy are needed), and "Visa Notification" letter (the original one and a photocopy are needed), which are both from the competent office of the Chinese government.   &gt; Please note:   &gt; (1) Your employer in China should get the Employment Permit and the "Visa Notification" letter for you from the competent office of the Chinese government, and then forward them to you to support your visa application.   &gt; (2) After presenting to the embassy the original Employment Permit and the "Visa Notification" letter, please ask for the return of them and only leave the photocopies to the consul together with the application. The original ones are needed when you go through procedures inside China.   &gt; (3) The Employment Visa is valid for 3 months. Bearer of the Visa should make the entry into China within this 3-month period, and apply for residence permit in the local Public Security Office within 30 days after arriving China. If need be, the bearer may also apply for a multiple re-entry visa in the same Public Security Office.   &gt; (4) The "PICK UP FORM" you get when you lodge the application is the only proof for collection; when lost, only the passport holder himself with proper photo ID can retrieve his passport.   &gt; (5) Please pay for the visa on collection (Please refer to Question 11, 12 for the visa fee), and please pay in cash, bank cheque, money order or company cheque. The "payee" should be CHINESE EMBASSY. The instructions are similar (but not the same) for [applying yourself](http://www.china-embassy.org/eng/hzqz/zgqz/t84245.htm) as an American wanting the visa.  Why pay someone to do it for you, when the instructions are fairly simple?  I have found that the Chinese consulates around the world are some of the friendliest to deal with.  You can email them, you can ask them questions, and sometimes they'll even help you (I had one girl refuse to accept my form because it wasn't filled out right...she told me what I needed to fill out and where)
I am the best whistler in the world. 
Actually screw tomatoes (plums?) and go for Spirulina instead.  Holy crap does that thing have super large quantities of everything!    [Page](http://www.healthalternatives2000.com/vegetables-nutrition-chart.html) it's on.   One cup has 1527 mg of Potassium or nearly the same amount of Potassium in 4 Bananas and 64 grams of protein!  Jeez.    Too bad it probably isn't sold anywhere near me.  
This isn't a relationship story, I just wanted to say that the OP here has been really active in talking to people in this thread. It's nice to see someone that puts a post up and then takes the time to reply to everyone's comments. You're a good guy OP.
Exactly. Prejudice led to the slavery.
I'm also here for the Atlanta party. 
I'm interested to hear your answer to that question.  If you do create a new thread for it, please post a link so we can follow.  Great posts, btw.  Extremely interesting and informative.
I LOVE THIS! Female here: I love taking good pics for my man. Make sure you are nice and ready, make your nipples nice and hard. Sometimes I even shine myself up with oil before taking the pic. I do lots from the side so you can get a good view of the good side of my chest. Ones where you're lying down on the bed and hold the phone above your head looking length wise down your body is nice. If you have a mirror play around with that see if you can get a view good reflection shots. Mirror also helps with booty shots lol. You're gonna have to take ALOT to get a few that you like. Oh and honestly having SOME clothing on is even sexier than being completely nude. Like say a jacket opening up a tad for him to see your body, off the shoulder, stuff like that. I also like editing my photos a bit before sending them. Some bright, and some black and white. Just play around it's really fun.
70's insanity. Thank you for showing me this.
Is a white kid who lives in a town noted for its high cow and Amish population a member of the oppressive class? Is he privileged (assuming what the norm is for a town like that, ie. nobody that isn't either white or native)?
There are few advantages to living in the UK... but the 18 age requirement for drinking makes first year pretty damn sweet.  Almost everybody drinks - legally - and in significant quantities.
Jeep Grand Cherokee? Jeep Cherokee? These vehicles have similar off-road capabilities to the 1993-2004 Jeep Wranglers, with a much more expedition-friendly cab.   Many mid-full size trucks would also be very good contenders. Similar to or better than the Tacoma in my opinion.
Looks like a nice neighborhood. Also, as an American, people like that make me hate America.
I know lots of people that haven't switched yet. 
yay thats so cool we be so close
Nope.
